Should patients Twiiter their surgery? Should hospitals use this as a marketing strategy?
+ http://pqasb.pqarchiver.com/latimes/access/521670312.html?dids=521670312:521670312&amp;FMT=CITE&amp;FMTS=CITE:AI&amp;date=May+20%2C+1967&amp;author=&amp;pub=Los+Angeles+Times&amp;desc=Israel+Warns+on+U.N.+Pullout&amp;pqatl=google + http://select.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html?res=F00A11FE345C177B93C0A8178AD85F4D8485F9 + http://select.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html?res=F60F13FE355D13728DDDAC0894D0405B8889F1D3 + http://pqasb.pqarchiver.com/chicagotribune/access/508111992.html?dids=508111992:508111992&amp;FMT=CITE&amp;FMTS=CITE:AI&amp;date=Apr+07%2C+1955&amp;author=&amp;pub=Chicago+Tribune&amp;desc=ISRAEL+WARNS+U.+N.+ARMISTICE+MAY+BE+BROKEN&amp;pqatl=google + http://select.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html?res=FB0E11FE345F177B93CBA91789D95F4D8485F9 + http://pqasb.pqarchiver.com/latimes/access/642440142.html?dids=642440142:642440142&amp;FMT=CITE&amp;FMTS=CITE:AI&amp;date=Dec+08%2C+1976&amp;author=&amp;pub=Los+Angeles+Times&amp;desc=Israel+Warns+It+Could+Withdraw+U.+N.+Resolution&amp;pqatl=google + http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/middle-east/israel-warns-britain-over-un-barrier-resolution-554028.html + http://select.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html?res=F10B11FD395F167B93C4A8178DD85F4C8485F9 + http://select.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html?res=FA0611FE3859107B93C3A91789D95F468785F9 + http://news.google.com/newspapers?id=WuUNAAAAIBAJ&amp;sjid=i20DAAAAIBAJ&amp;pg=7175,543153&amp;dq=israel-warns + http://pqasb.pqarchiver.com/chicagotribune/access/506693062.html?dids=506693062:506693062&amp;FMT=CITE&amp;FMTS=CITE:AI&amp;date=Sep+30%2C+1955&amp;author=&amp;pub=Chicago+Tribune&amp;desc=ISRAEL+WARNS+RUSS+OF+ARMS+DEAL+DANGERS&amp;pqatl=google + http://pqasb.pqarchiver.com/jpost/access/937550511.html?dids=937550511:937550511&amp;FMT=ABS&amp;FMTS=ABS:FT&amp;date=Nov+27%2C+2005&amp;author=TOVAH+LAZAROFF&amp;pub=Jerusalem+Post&amp;desc=Israel+warns+EU+report+may+damage+relations.+%3B+Draft+policy+statement+calls+post-%2767+neighborhoods%3B+illegal+settlements%27&amp;pqatl=google + http://www.accessmylibrary.com/coms2/summary_0286-25291956_ITM
Yeah, I completely understand. You give a better explanation for why abandoning the alcoholism trait was good for Family Guy, they didn't know how to work with it, and having Peter trying to overcome it would have been really out of character.  I'm with you on the lack of personalities, and it does make things seem lazy, probably because they are. You will never hear me say Family Guy is perfect, my main intention was to point out that the change in the character's traits from the beginning to now has, by and large, not been for the worse.
&gt;[...F]aith in can be true, [but] the problem is that you don't know until you have evidence. Faith at that point becomes meaningless. Hmm. We're so close and yet so far. I maintain that life without Faith is meaningless.  Seriously, what do you think is the meaning of life? I submit that it is Love. Love for God and Love of the people around me. &gt;Other people's faith that is just as valid as yours can be HORRIBLE. Agreed. Double agreed that Libertarianism is the solution for secular interaction. &gt;I would submit that it would be better to investigate the inner workings of your brain and get that same effect without believing something that is false or cannot be shown as accurate. That would be best, no?  Why is this better? Why do you think it would necessarily have the same effect? We have already agreed that Faith is unable to be investigated using reason, so what tool would I use to say the results of the investigation is the same as having faith? &gt; I think making a consistent worldview promotes prosperity and unity in a society where special rules and faith based views promote divisiveness and struggles between irrational things...again resulting in more conflict. I think that love for others is more likely to achieve this goal. 
CNN is watching.  (shifty eyes)
&gt;What in the hell would cause you to make a major glibc or gcc change on a production machine? Once its built, its built. Update some packages perhaps, but the entire system?  Is there a better way to get security updates than emerge -vuD world? I believe that's what we were doing. Back in 2005 or so there was an update to, I believe, glibc which ended up requiring us rebuild almost all of our production systems. The old profile that we were on was no longer supported, so we had to transition to the new profile. The new profile required the new glibc. This was not the first time something like this has happened, but it is one of the things that made us rethink our use of Gentoo. My biggest complaint will forever be running dispatch-conf after every update to clean up config upstream config file changes, though. I suppose you can pretty safely ignore this, but that just seems sloppy to me.
Creative use of that weird artifacting effect you get with some videos. 
hey no sense of humor *and* a bitch.. are you *the guy* he was talking about? truth hurts doesn't it? Truth simply is.. just like logic simply is.. it's only dumb niggers that go for a popular accepted brand name to pretend they are getting truth without thinking it through.. so they don't have to think for themselves on a topic and have it spoon fed to them. So if CNN said it.. you might swallow it? But a joke about his friend being a pussy fag bitch warps time and space for you? Fucking grow a pair biatch.
"John" Stewart? You mean "Jon" Stewart?
free
I am going to sell my kidney dialysis machine.  This is more important.  Seriously.
How does birth occur with this creature?
KILL HIM AND EAT HIS HEART TO GAIN HIS POWER!
**It isn't waste if you actually use it.** Tattoo that on your forehead so you don't forget.   -rwxr-xr-x 1 root root 8890344 2008-05-02 10:22 /usr/bin/emacs22-x  It's almost nine megs. For a program I use constantly, that's nothing. It's a tiny cost for everything it gives me.  Adding in all of the modes (major and minor) would increase the number. Duh. But I only install the modes I need (well, by and large) so, again, it isn't waste.
Only when it's on CNN.
Toronto Island.  Take a dog and pick up some chicks.  Where did you move from? What are you into?  I can give you a bunch of places to try.
I don't take offense with being lumped. It saves a lot of confusion in conversations. In the same way, I will call any white person a white person, or maybe a westerner, or "gwailo" in Cantonese, because you all look the same.
&gt;It only has 2 labs in the country able to test for it.  We're not that far ahead of them in that regard. Hospitals and clinics can make a presumptive diagnosis for out of season Influenza A, but we're still sending viral media to the CDC for confirmation. Your doctor can no more definitively diagnose Swine Flu than a Mexican doctor right now. 
People who'd intentionally open a door on a motorcyclist deserve to be punched in the junk - with a car door.
It looks quite biased for me, maybe the followed the wrong evaluation process. I Agree that Google should be in the top places but I do not understand how could Apple outperform TOYOTA. Edit: I'm talking about the full report which is here:  http://www.millwardbrown.com/Sites/Optimor/Media/Pdfs/en/BrandZ/BrandZ-2009-Report.pdf
You should totally make *evil fliers*!!!
Isn't that what garbage men do?  In the US there are parts of the country where rubbish (food scraps, etc..) are collected for pig farmers.
Two points:  1. A Commercial Database costs less per year than a decent developer makes in a month or two. This is a drop in the bucket for us. 2. [This guy doesn't know shit about databases](http://www.codingthewheel.com/archives/diagramming-the-poker-tracker-3-database)
Wasn't that the Nuremberg Defence, "Hitler said it was legal to exterminate the Jews?"
they found fraggle rock!
Help outlaw blogspam.
Dualism gets around the problem by postulating a separate plane of existence not subject to causality.  Naturalism does not have this out, but it does not necessarily fall into infinite regression, except for all the origins explanations I have seen put forth.
Neither knowledge nor education beyond 1st grade are required to be a reporter *or a member of Congress* these days.
For almost as long as I've known anything about people's spiritual beliefs I've always thought Jesus was a great teacher, much the same as other eastern guides way before his time.  There is definitely a quest each person needs to take during their life and find out what life means to them.  I feel that religion, rather than getting you closer to the purpose of life derails your quest.  Atheists at least have a consistent worldview and are intellectually honest with their beliefs (no special pleading fallacies).  Atheists, however, get derailed by debating people already derailed from their inner quest.  God or not, there is a huge world inside each of us that we rarely get to know.  Whether it is divine or just the awesomeness of the human experience, more would get done if people took some time out for themselves each day to reflect on it rather than focus so much on other trivial things.  Of course I'm still a big fan of arguing =)
That is....quite a stretch. OSTRICH JOKE! I win!
Don't read part 3, it has spoilers.
You've misunderstood the argument somewhat. As the amount of data *approaches* infinity, the probability of a specific set of data appearing approaches 1. An infinite amount of resources was not needed, and indeed there will only be a finite amount of data before the set that we are looking for appears.  There's no infinite regression here.
Awesome.
Hmmm. Then why'd this happen in Canada?
Whaaaaaatttt????
They still sell all that stuff through Impulse as well.
Control. The people in charge want to have a monopoly on violence, because whoever can beat the shit out of everybody else makes the rules. If normal people were able to use violence, that would be a possible threat to those in power, so they quash anyone willing to fight for themselves, so they can stay in charge.  Reason #50499320203 why I hate the world.
no, they just use short people and children.  that's the origin of the phrase "hiding in your mother's skirt."
**Hate those muh'fuckin blinkers !**
Handy text navigation tips from a programmer:  -----------------  When navigating a text document, you can use the Ctrl key as a modifier - * *Ctrl+Home/End* goes to the start/end of the document * *Ctrl+PgUp/PgDn* goes to the start/end of the text on window * *Ctrl+Left/Right arrow* goes to the start/end of the prev/next word * *Ctrl+Up/Down arrow* scrolls the window
I agree - and I used to hang with fundees. You can't change people unless they want it or you'll look like a dick.  I would focus on whatever there is about the family that you can enjoy while you're there. Enjoy them as much as you can. If you can't - don't go home so often. 
&gt;Amazingly enough, 7 starts up and shuts down quite quickly -- about half the time   FTFY :)
Kashmir: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Haufatv0vy0
Indeed. We can't intelligent leaders as long as the pool that we're pulling from is ignorant. The solution will not come from the top down, but I have no idea how we can go from the bottom up. It deeply saddens me to see the stupidity, intolerance, and mindless that goes on in all spectrums of society nowadays. And the worst part about it is that *they don't think there's anything wrong with themselves*. The mark of a true wise man is the ability to say "I'm wrong. Your ideas make sense." Schools are only as effective as the students themselves want them to be, and laws only prevent the very bottom of the barrel from destabilizing the entire country. Why is humanity like this? I wish there was something I could do. ::sigh:: /rant
Even leaving out nukes from the equation, North Korea has enough conventional artillery pointed at the south to flatten Seoul. The South Koreans certainly don't want another war with the North.
Candlejack likes me and lets me talk. 
Is there oil there?   then fuck 'em! 
How else would you get to feel more secure in your own position?
Alex had made his mind up that the virus was manufactured two days into the thing...the cdc is now saying that it doesn't have any avian or human components...it's two strains of swine flu. I'm from Texas.(full disclosure, i don't live there now) i don't trust authority...there is inequality and fraud that is systemically rampant in parts of society...but listen to me...please, please listen. Alex Jones is a shuck and jive man. a hustler. a cheap suit tent preacher (ask someone from the south what that means) a salesman. buy a water filter or some gold coins...or those snake oil detox "teas"...buy some dehydrated food...that's all he does...he serves as a bug zapper for paranoids to tune into and BE MARKETED TO. jesus christ grow up.
I actually agree with all that. I am a skipper so I prefer watching the 10 minutes of family guy thats worth watching and just skipping the rest, American Dad just can't hold my attention.  I also find it funny that Sit Down, Shut Up has so much going for it and yet seems to be quite hated, while Seth MacFarlane shows are frequently less funny and avoid almost all criticism. Its not an amazing show, which is somewhat disappointing considering all the talent behind it, but its still better than American Dad and 20 bucks says it will be better than the Cleavland Show.
Funny how this is not being covered by anyone else, innit?
Sorry guy, downvote if you must - but  * "I absolutely need Photo$hop CS2 win32" (because that's the only version you managed to &lt;strike&gt;crack&lt;/strike&gt;/buy) is not a valid argument for the rest of us.  Exactly what percentage of the Windows user base has a Adobe CS license?  If you want to use Photoshop, you have to use some version of Windows or OSX, but that's your problem, not mine. BTW: Virtualization (Windows and Linux on the same machine) or Remote Destkop (Windows on different machine) works pretty well for Linux users who need some Windows programs. It works for me.
I don't understand why she's called "Air Hockey Chick".  Can someone explain?
Until the assets of Italy get frozen in the USA.
Tubes and Hoses!
and while you are at it, don't buy his books anymore.
I have a hard time doubting the Thanatos Institute.  I have an extensive background in Latin, and clearly remember Thanatos as being the angel of love, or something along those lines.  Don't doubt me; I'm an expert in this field.
Chill out, guys. I'm sure this was during a team-building seminar for Kellogg's.
If you based your judgment on "logic" you would draw the conclusion that God is unjust.  What you are basing your judgment on is the idea that *regardless* of what God does, he is somehow right.  It's a dangerous mindset and has led many people into murder and war. Killing a man to defend your family is a far cry from overtaking another man's house, in his own city and property, and murdering his children, because you think God told you to do it.  If you need an explanation of the atheistic values of right and wrong, [here](http://scienceblogs.com/pharyngula/2009/04/biologos.php) is a link.  It's not a difficult concept to grasp.  A God isn't the only thing that can magically provide morals.  As far as killing your son/self in order to fix a problem you created... well for one thing it's a pretty crappy system.  For another thing it's a terrible way to begin a relationship.  Think about it-- going into a relationship on the basis of someone telling you that you owe them for something you didn't ask them to do?  I think it's foolish at best.
What a prime example of how the republcan media machine works. I couldn't come up with a better example myself. But let me try: Ahoy1 tells reddit readers: "...how delightfully republican"   our country is.  This is classic!
My vote for the most idiotic site of the year.
Wow, a facebook login page! Cool!
&gt;Dr. Booble   srsly?
I find a 1911 filled with hollow points has much better range.  This would certainly be useful if I deplete my ammo stockpiles, however.
It depends on what you like...here are some of my favorites:  Mount &amp; Blade  Psychonauts  Orange Box (Half Life series, TF2, Portal)
Behaviors, like suicide are genetic. If you can associate suicide with depression (which Im assuming most people can) then you can associate suicide with genes.
So you couldn't afford eating after that?
This makes me disappointed that swine flu isn't going to kill large numbers of people.
Is it really a mazda RX series without the rotary engine?
A group of scientists have unveiled what they say is the most comprehensive study ever of African genes. Published following a decade of study, the researchers say their findings give new insight into the origins of humans. 
Not at all - While I agree that Buddhism gets an easier ride on here than the other religions, primarily because of it's 'philosophy' standpoint, I and many others I have seen on here have criticised it strongly for the supernatural beliefs that go along with it.   
It's a tail call to + with foo() and 5 as arguments. Would it help you if instead of +, I used operator.add?   return operator.add(foo(),5)  Now, things get interesting though if foo() returns something other than a number. If foo() instead returns an instance with an \_\_add\_\_ method:   import operator    class blah:   def __add__(self, y):    return 5*y    def foo():   return blah()    print foo() + 3  #prints 15  print operator.add(foo(), 6) #prints 30
mmm  http://www.montrealpoutine.com
Not anymore it's not!
It doesn't have to do with your OS X languages (which are plist-files with translations included in the .apps etc), but with your font not having an entry for that unicode character. Maybe you changed the default font in Safari (or whatever browser you are running)? Also, ASCII does not cut it unless one believes that the world revolves around English speaking countries only. I would have a hard time writing Japanese in ASCII :) Also, the most important thing, we wouldn't be able to enjoy the antics of look_of_disapproval, would we? 
How soon is now?
Make it switch to be a Democrat.  Filibuster majority.
Absolutely. I cannot recommend this book enough as an intro text. TONS of source code.
Dammit i just finished reading some walking dead and this was the first link I clicked on. Now I have to re-organise my z day case.
That doesn't really mean much to anyone who can't read Japanese, I'd think. The game Nebu is referring to is Rhythm Tengoku, or Rhythm Heaven in the US.  I agree that it's a good game. It's a bit quirky and easy to pick up even for people who aren't into music/rhythm games (although I imagine it more like a mini-game collection with music).
Priceless quote from the commment section of the article:  *maybe we should agree to deal with the flow of illegal DVDs going across the border if they agree to do something about the flow of illegal guns going the other way.*
social security is a problem, but it's not nearly as insolvent as medicare and medicade. Social Security has a lot of societal benefits and not even the repubs would get rid of the program.  They might have even kinda tried to privatize it, but it didn't pass in a repub congress and president.  It's too popular and saves too many people.   
Hey, can you do [me](http://imgur.com/GCM.jpg)?   Sorry the picture is over 25 years old, my looks have faded. The upshot is that any conclusions you draw about my personality from this shot, are likely spot on :)
&gt;Hm!  Hm, indeed...
Yes, I'm the one who is expressing themselves poorly, not the racist troll.  Yawn.
&gt;The garbageman is paid a very good wage for an easy (but disgusting) job  Which is my point. They are paid well because they wouldn't be stupid enough to allow themselves to fall under the same system you are fighting for.  &gt;The fast food worker, who I DO tip?!?! He isn't taxed on tips and he is part of a subset of employees who can probably live on less money than waiters/bartenders/casino dealers.  Tip the guy handing you the food over the counter. It's not much different than tipping the guy who brings your food to you from a counter.  Carl's Jr (and some other fast food chains) have people bring your food to your table...not because it is taking too long, but because that is simply part of their service. They bring your food, drinks (if it isn't a fountain drink), any condiments you need, and they clean up the table. They do the **exact same** job as a waiter in any restaurant, but don't expect tips and make more per hour.  They are legally required to report tips (Though obviously don't) and pay taxes. Everyone is. Waiters aren't special. You don't get a special tip tax. Your job is only different because you're assumed to be getting tips, so that tax is in your face all the time.  Good service is rare. I tip very well when I get it. If the service is poor I won't tip unless it is a place I go to often. The only reason I tip in that scenario is because I'm afraid of jerks like you ruining my food who think they are entitled to a tip.  If you don't like the tip situation, get a different job. It is that simple.
Pirates of the Burning Sea
I love how questioning the standard atheist-reddit ideology automatically makes you a theist.  Sorry to disappoint, but I'm an atheist through and through. But I could very strongly argue that just because you "feel" something is immoral, or you "just know" it is immoral is a pretty poor reasoning for something being immoral.  If I just know that something is not immoral, does this mean it is not immoral? You seem to be stuck in the paradox of trying to use subjectivity to assume an objective stance. 
isn't it time to start differentiating with a new term between people who see things they can't identify which is the technical definition of UFO (Unidentified flying Object) and those who believe they have seen something from another planet?  I suggest AFO for something some believes is an Alien Flying Object rather just an unidentified one that could be anything.
Even people who are only 7-8 feet often come across difficulties living (vascular/heart and joints)... so theres no telling what problems someone 15 feet tall would have.
I can never do tedious stuff like that. Copying notes of any type makes my mind lock up.
What do you mean "you people"?
It is stealing.  Games, because they exist as software, are hard to connect to "stealing" as most people see "stealing".  Mostly because the analogies used for software piracy are "Wouldn't it be stealing if you took a [physical object]?"  So, to help you understand that it *is* theft, look at it this way:  You hire a gardener to take care of your land.  He works for months and months until he is done landscaping your property so that it looks great.  You really love the job he's done, too.  So he comes to you with the bill, but it's really high. Sure, you love the job he's done but you don't feel like paying that much.  So you say "fuck off" and keep your garden without paying him.  After all, he didn't lose money because you weren't going to pay that much anyways!  It's the exact same thing with software.  People spent months and months working on that software.  They put a lot of time, effort, and money into developing that software.  And you'd like to take it for free because meh, it cost too much in your opinion...  \*edit\* And I should add that if you want to throw up the "Well then they should change their business model" excuse, there is only one business model for software that can truly prevent piracy and that's ransomware, where the developer says "The software is finished but won't be released until we receive [amount] in donations"  And **nobody** wants that...
There certainly are some passionate responses here?  Is there more that people wanted to see/know?  Do tell.  Rock on kitties!
Mmh mm, and likely, contractors that are still using tables are indeed very stupid.  The real answer is you should peek at the source on their portfolio.  On the other hand though, if you know CSS/html, why are you hiring?  The problem is technical languages go so far over the heads of normal folks that there is no way for them to pick the "better developer" between two people.
Who will want to work for the CIA now, knowing that their identities can now be made public.
Get on my knees and spray.
It seems that you need a lot of entertainment and something to fill up your free time...  Have you considered video games?
Stalker? I clicked on your name and read some of your old posts to see the depths of your stupidity. You did not disappoint.  &gt;ou've already proven you are part of the "me too" nigger zombie swarm of black jesus and impervious to correction..   Fucking genius.   &gt;you are your own worst punishment  Irony is delicious 
Hell no.  That's the only way that I have to talk them into letting me do it.
oooooh scary music
Which introspection tools do you mean? SQL Trace, Tuning Advisor, and Query Execution Plan Analysis are mostly all I use.  I'm always looking for better tools.  Have you seen [SQLTac](http://www.cabercomputing.com/Products-SqlTac.aspx)?
How does the Big Bang necessarily fall victim to infinite regress?
Alcohol. Not too much. I prefer wine but beer tends to be the drink of choice for this.  A printer. Print out the code and read it by hand with a pencil.  A love-life. After fixing it all you won't feel any better about yourself, but at least he/she will be there.
Characterization? Are you kidding me? The characters on South Park are like the flashbacks on Family Guy - interchangeable. Have you ever noticed how the mentality of people like Stan, Kyle, and Cartman switch completely around from episode to episode? Take the Cartoon Wars episode for example, in that episode Cartman voices the opinions of Matt and Trey, yet just two episodes later he's calling for 9/11 investigations. When discussing illegal music downloads Stan, and Kyle act like children, but any other time they have the mentality of weathered adults. Their catholic priest is an idiot, until of course the creators decide to make an episode about Catholic priests and suddenly he's the voice of reason. Their is no single reliable trait about any of the characters on that show. Their personalities are completely contextual. And yet they wonder why people like both their show and Family Guy. They're both shows for people who don't like to actually think things through.
Hummer with no plates. Attempted hit-and-run. 12 witnesses. Gang-related threat. Cop admitting he would hit a cyclist on purpose.  Officer Cho needs to be fired.
Aha, so at last our disagreement becomes clear.
Satellite array.
I thought it was manbirdpig?  Did the schism occur because of the CNN thing?
Protip: turn off all sounds in windows for better performance.
How do you know the one kid was the first to use a racial slur or throw the first punch? Because the story says so?  I am surprised people are downvoting comments that are trying to be objective and get the whole story. No one said what the white kid did was ok. If the story happened exactly as it is in the article then the Korean did the right thing and the bully got what he deserved.  We are only saying that the story is very one sided and we don't know the truth.   Remember the story about the cop that tackled the biker in NY? What if there were an article talking about how the biker swerved at him and was threatening other people. The cop would look like he was right in doing what he did. We had video proof though that his side of the story was wrong.  Not too long ago there was a story about a kid supposedly being suspended from school for using Firefox. The article was very one sided and everyone was sending hate mail to the teacher. Later it turns out that the whole story is told and the kid made it all up. He forged an expulsion note and everyone felt stupid for defending the kid and getting pissed off at the teacher.   We should try to get as much evidence as possible before knee jerk reactions. This story could very well have happened like the article says. It could also just be the Korean kid making up something and justifying his actions.   It's possible that the Korean kid is a bully and no one at the school likes the White kid. The Korean kid beat him up and then made up a story to justify what he did.  Again, if the story is true exactly how it is written then the Bully got what he deserved and props to the Korean kid.  I would just like to hear the other side of the story before I pass judgment. I would like to be objective and hear all the evidence not just one side.  If people want to downvote me for wanting more evidence and for being objective then so be it.
I have a problem with any excuse for ananswer that is based on someone's magical thinking or faith or feelings or the voices in his head, instead of reality. Saying that the universe is the way it is because wiggedy-wiggedy seven flavours of magic angels or sun gods or whatever is no form of answer. It doesn't explain anything or contribute anything, it just regurgitates some pre-existing superstition.  What would you do if you met a Midianite?
i think you're probably correct
Incredible photoshop work there. I could swear that looks almost EXACTLY like the real facebook login page! But he did make a few mistakes. You can tell because of the pixels...
While in the Marines I knew a Captain Bonar; he was dreading picking up Major.
Good points.
The notion of hipster is one of irony. That means that being a hipster is mocking both the notion of style in culture, as well as being a hipster. It's an infinite self-referential irony loop.
I'd like to make the point that if we remove 100 million from the "We need to barrow it pile" it's actually more than 100 million due to the interest we won't have to pay on it.   Beyond this point it is still a very small fraction of the total budget but some cuts are better than no cuts.
Disgruntled:  * airline employees (pilots, stewardesses) * airport facility employees (baggage handlers, sewage tank operators) * airport commercial employees (fast food, gift shops) * TSA employees (screeners, me)
You gotta be kidding me, after 2-3 years of hard use (Mario Paint) my SNES mouse buttons had to be pushed until your fingers bled in order to get them to register. Never the less I still love it.
And a lot of the times it's records instead of books.
There are several other grammatical and spelling errors that intrigued me. Having not realized it was a joke, I continued reading under the assumption the author was so panicky he hit the wrong keys. 
You bought a house a year out of college? 
I've lived in small town Ontario and Nashville TN and I the main difference I've seen is that generally the dumb and ignorant here will change their mind if they are shown what is correct. Example: Redneck hates Asians...meets cool Asian person at work...has beer with Asian...Likes Asians.   
Yes, it does a very good job at shielding you from the actual underlying operations.  I would argue that is a problem within itself.  But then again, see my username.
Fill a paper or styro cup w/water, take with you to stall, rinse emptied cap by pouring h2o, trash cup in supplied bin in stall, leave stall, wash hands very well, have a nic eday.
Mutant healing or laser vision?
Minister S&amp;P and Moody's and Emperor Federal Reserve...
I gave up trying to write an effective corewarrior once upon a time, and instead wrote a c program to breed them and pit them against each other, genetic algorithm style. Fun times!
That's my fear, too. Complacency reinforced by a media strangled by government into telling little or nothing of the truth. We won't know we're dying until we have. 
I don't know if I'd call it the *opposite* of badass. It's not like it involves rainbows and my little pony, or something like that. But I get what you're saying.
Finally, some good press for aspartame.
Wow.  Just wow.  I think that officially qualifies Brownie as a bigger _______ than goatse.
&gt;A Noble police officer who had responded to a report of a snake in a tree...  I'm surprised he didn't try to taze it.
That's the one where the lady gives birth after doing it in the butt, right?
I agree 100%
If we get CSI on this, we should be able to zoom in on one of the cop's eyes and catch the reflected image!
THE ONE ON THE BOTTOM RIGHT.
Aliens.
The state? How can you blame the entire state? 99% of the Minnesota didn't even have a chance to vote for her/her opponent.
Is this just a big list of things that will never happen?
Are you on the development team?  That's cool, I knew you mainly from Git advocacy (e.g.: whygitisbetterthanx.com), but it's nice to know that you are working on making an alternative DVCS a Git citizen.  Keep up the good work.
Someone, I don't care who, please tell me how a mental miniature such as Michelle Bachmann gets elected in the first place?  And you can't use the "stupid  people are stupid" argument.  That's already a given.  Dig deeper.
People are terrible at risk assessment... anything sensational is blown way out of proportion while people die from health issues and car wrecks every day.
While I prefer to think of myself as closer to Proudhon than Marx (and never expected to be defending Marx to a supporter of Proudhon), what about policies that weren't among Marx's planks? For example, implementation of the KGB?  Restriction of freedom of movement or expression?  I also don't see anything in his planks about favoring dictatorship over democracy. Couldn't it be possible that the policies that caused the USSR's failure were the ones that weren't among the 10 planks?
I heard that too, but I thought it was only possible if the land was already in the families possession then the title can be transfered, but I haven't researched it so I could be wrong.
So, how many wrinkles were there?
Try paper.
&gt;sometimes practical  Perhaps its the ignorance of your average CTO, but this statement made me think: "Gee, that steak lunch MSFT picked up the tab for was quite delicious.  How many licenses do I need to buy for volume discounts?"
Do the police have a van big enough to hold all of them?
I think the error in this study is that almost everyone downloads music.  So to not download music doesn't mean that you think downloading is bad it just means you don't listen to music.  
Truthfully, just disable comments altogether. It's not worth it.
This happened to me around the age of 25.  I smoked every day for 10 years, and now when I take a few puffs I get totally paranoid and have to sit in a corner to keep myself from spazzing out.  Guess I'm old now.
It was written well, and it was entertaining.
Hate to sound picky, but I want one that doesnt cost a fortune, is reasonably fireproof, is big enough for maybe 4 longrifles, 4 pistols &amp; misc other stuff I'd like to keep in a safe (laptop, digital camera, coins, jewelry, metal detector etc. etc.).  Also... I have to be able to move the thing myself (with a dolly or something) up about 5 stairs/steps, but not so easily that some thief can make off with it.
Yeah, that'd be pretty awesome. Obviously it would make for some very interesting PvP battles, but it would also be neat to see PvE bots against Blizzard's AI, to see what Blizzard's programmers are capable of.
[This](http://www.deezteez.com/funny-t-shirts/24/go-fuck-yourself-t-shirt.html)
What does "pro" mean?  What does "you mean" above mean?  What does ""marriage"" mean?  what does "person" mean?
That's because you're greedy.
thanks for putting the 'rhode island' episode back into my mental media player.
Great response on how much changed in Vista.  If very little changed than compatibility issues would be virtually non-existent.
The aporkalypse is just beginning!
Im happy for Van Every, but I'm still thinking that Youk should be the next Captain. With his Gold Glove, Patience at the plate, ability to drive in runs, clubhouse demeanor, etc., he seems to be a great leader.
You might be interested in similar games that are implemented in higher level languages, like RoboCode: http://robocode.sourceforge.net/
Get the fuck back to China where he belongs!  (Not my opinion, but apparently a common attitude in Keswick.)
An overly PC op-ed writer wants to create a permanent religious sub sect caste of garbage collectors -- albeit using modern methods of the "Waste Disposal Industry Association."  This idea made me laugh out loud.  Moreover, they would probably just turn into an organized crime kind of Mafia.  So, these people have been "recycling" for hundreds of years... LOL
Based on your definition of the two, I would have to say I believe. "Choosing to believe" seems to me, would be believing in the face of contrary evidence, or in spite of a weak argument. After some time reading the Bible it allows you to explore the idea of who God is and getting a glimpse at his purpose for this world. Seeing how everything, absolutely everything I've ever read in the bible has rung true, empirically it follows that I have to believe.  
Bloody hell!  What do elephants use for  tampons?   Sheep.  Why do elephants have trunks?  Sheep don't have strings.
Er - that isn't blatant PR spin to you?
Had to [retire it](http://www.animalshirts.net/wolfshirts/wolfshirt-moon.jpg) because I was getting wayyyyy too much pussy. 
http://www.reddit.com/new?sort=rising
*Can you not see that you are only reading what you want to see in these comments?*  Which was why BlueBeard was bitching endlessly about having to pay for older people's health care. Some other guy even made a comment about how people over 60 should be blasted into the sun and that when he turns 60, he'd be volunteered to be blasted, too. Not to mention that this is what they've been trying to justify all damn day. They don't think they're more important, oh no.  It's hard to argue because the idea that younger and older people are inferior and less important is like a subtle given in our culture, but it isn't hard to see through if you think about it for a little while.  *I don't believe you are a troll, only because I don't think anyone could stay so perfectly balanced on the Poe's law line between incoherent bullshit and hints of human emotion and reason without you truly believing in what you are saying. I'm not even going to try to argue against you because I've found that arguing against a wall makes you look more insane than the wall itself.*  Well, then I guess the World Health Organization is a bunch of trolls too, because they acknowledge [that the seasonal flu is worse than the swine flu, in large part because of the number of deaths.](http://www.latimes.com/features/health/la-sci-swine-reality30-2009apr30,0,3606923.story)  But hey, this is Happy Fantasy Fuck Land where anyone who isn't between the ages of 25 and 45 aren't human beings, don't matter to anyone, don't have families or people who care about them, and are worthless trash suited to be blasted into space.  I wonder if there isn't a gas leak where you people live that made you all into sociopaths or something. How can you all seriously insinuate that your age group is the only one that matters?
There's no such thing as a "TSA Approved" lock. We don't sponsor any brands nor offer certification. That's purely a marketing gimmick on the part of Samsonite.  The TSA screener couldn't open your lock so they opened it the only other way they could. Arguably this was not a very kind or courteous screener. It's likely your DVDs "fell out."
I am a student in video production and design. Not only am I on my way up to greater things (I'm interning with Adult Swim this summer) but vfx is something many of my classmates are striving for. From our experience, the software is not longer code oriented. It's all visual. So much of it requires an understanding of graphical storytelling, and the software that comes with.  Someone that can understand when a Line Producer or Director describes the final scene in the head when the only reference material are some green screen shots and storyboards will go a long way. You MUST have an ability to actualize someone else's vision.  That being said, there is software you need, sometimes it can be specific programs, sometimes it's a matter of knowing 2-3 programs in a field.  Here are a few you should be proficient with:  * After Effects - especially expressions, masking, and 3D layers.  * Photoshop - to many this is a gimmie, but it's also a filter, it's like knowing Office 2007 for a desk job. You must be fluent in Photoshop  * Final Cut Pro / Avid - Sorry. Premiere doesn't cut it. Gots to be Avid or FCP, and if you could only choose one of the 2, choose FCP. It's the program moving up to be the new standard.  * You MUST MUST MUST know some 3D program. Maya or Lightwave are ideal, but if you know Blender or Cinema 4D you're well enough along you can probably pick up whatever the company is specifically using.  * Probably a good idea to know audio software too. Pro Tools is the standard, no ifs ands or buts on this one. If you claim to know audio programs, you better know PT. PT is great icing on the vfx cake.  The truth is that being entry level, you're not going to get to do what you want, but software literacy is a big step in the right direction, and it will get your foot in the door. Many of these programs work well together, so knowing how to integrate the work is also valuable.  vfx is hard. People that do it protect their jobs and work their interns over the top. interns guard renders and watch video conversions for fuckups and botches.  Oh. Know your codecs and compressions. Know the difference between DV, D1, and HD. Know what progressive and interlaced is. What is 4:3 and 16:9. what compressions are used for web and what are used for TV and movies. For some this is common knowledge, for others it's new. It's a baseline requirement for the video world to know this like the back of your hand. Know your frame rates too.  Truth be told a lot of people get degrees to do this kind of stuff, the volume of things to learn can be daunting for many. The up side though is that experience really counts as much as a degree does. Many folks on the software side of it are drop outs or quit their degree for a job or changed careers. It's a mixed group so there's some latitude there.  Lynda.com is the **BEST** place to find starter to intermediate tutorials for multimedia software.   Build a reel and never forget, it's not what you know, but it's who you blow.  Best of luck.
For the insurance to be meaningful, you would have to be a faithful adherent to every god of every culture, otherwise you are just rolling the dice that your particular culture and time period has it right.   Besides that, 'it won't hurt you' is awfully glib. It actually costs you a whole lot in potential experiences missed out on and decades of guilt, muddled thinking, and willful ignorance.
Bi now, gay later.
Don't you think that's a little extreme of a tone when your talking about kids (who we don't legally consider to be able to make all decisions for themselves, hence the term "legal gaurdian"), and when your talking about the availability within a government institution? The only reason these junk foods are in the schools in the first place is because the organizations that determine that sort of thing get the shit lobbied out of them by food corporations. Those same food lobbies are the reason this bill probably won't be passed. Oh well, good on them for trying, our kids are fat as fuck. While the government has no right to tell them what not to eat, they certainly have a right to not facilitate their obesity.
is it really that simple?
That'll show 'em whose boss.
I feel the same way, I'm just playing old games like x-com, fallout, mechwarrior... I keep waiting for a game to surpass those, but truthfully I'm not even sure what I'm waiting for...
I see her going clockwise, but if I fast forward the video I see her going counterclockwise. I also managed to convince myself to see her going counterclockwise while the video was playing, but only briefly.
they are called k-clips they run about 15 bucks and most head shops have them if they sell high end glass like roor, phx, illa, medicali, etc.
The lazy way to walk across the room is to use Firefox's ImageZoom extension.
I don't hate all cops, but I think the majority of them are at least a little bit corrupt some of the time.  They definitely have a tendency to abuse their powers when it becomes convenient.  One night a couple of friends and I were taking a shortcut home through a seedy area.  We see a cop on the side of the road doing patrol and drive past him.  As soon as we take a right onto the next road, the cop flicks his lights and pulls us over and searches us.  The reason?  He didn't know what a "bunch of white boys were doing driving through an area like this at night" - it was a big meth/crack/coke area.  Thing is, we didn't buy any crack in that neighborhood because we didn't do crack, but we did have a joint.  The cop ends up calling in two backup cars for a single joint.  One of the cops finds our Funyuns and Mountain Dew.  His response?  "Ah, here's the munchies!  When we pull the brothers over downtown they always have cheesesteak sandwiches and grape juice".  It was actual pretty funny at the time, but not very classy.  In a since, their suspicions about us carrying drugs was correct, but I still feel that we were victims of profiling.  And of course, we had the idiot "neighborhood cops" growing up.  They wouldn't waste any time harassing skateboarding children on a straight 25mph side street with 1 car every 10-15 minutes.  However, when my sister's bike gets stolen, they refuse to even patrol the neighborhood looking for it.  They were an effing useless bunch.  And I've yet to be pulled over by a cop that wasn't wisecracking the whole time.  They always just "know" that they're better than you and they don't waste anytime making this known.
This has been posted by a Christian troll to get us to believe in demonic possession.  And it would appear demons have shit choice in music.
Wow, at 2:26 he goes from awesome street musician to badass ghostbuster in one 180 degree turn.
HE's right.
You must be having nightmares. You should be glad to no longer be under the oppression of massive spiders and gorillas through the night.
i haven't been on a school bus since 2003, and i remember riding exactly two in my lifetime with seatbelts for every passenger. (2 per seat)
You can edit your preference to not show things that you've up/down voted.  That might help you.
it's not fucking that's the point
How do you link to your edited version afterwards?  edit: link
What's all that about? What program?
Who the hell is Jack Welch, a legend in his own mind? 
My thoughts exactly.
Better than being Jabberwocked.
Phone (the cheap kind) and a graphing calculator. I bet it comes out to about 10 MB.
the funniest bit is he was korean (:
Yeah. The problem with Sit Down Shut Up is how much they are trying to do all at once. They have close to ten characters and they are trying to develop them all at once, giving all of them something to do in each episode. This leaves each character's story feeling short and insubstantial, and the audience can never get a good feel for the character. They need episodes focused on only three or four characters until they are all fully formed. I am still holding out hope that it will get better, but I enjoy it now and don't understand all the hate.
This is not stressed enough. People always talk about how the healthcare systems were way worse in 1918 so we're less likely to see such a massive death toll, but globalization is a factor that really throws the probabilities in a bad direction. So many people and things are moving all around the world all the time. This virus can now more easily move across the globe, and while it might not be such a big deal when the symptoms are relatively mild, all it takes is one unlucky mutation for it to turn really deadly. Again, with globalization, if such a thing were to happen, the super-deadly strain could infect the world over in less than 48 hours.  It's been almost 100 years since the last massive flu pandemic and people have been saying that we're overdue. I really think this might be the one to answer that call.
Check out that group shot... *slobbering*  What's the lens/tupperware combo in the lower left corner?
This one made me smile: http://www.thinkgeek.com/tshirts-apparel/unisex/itdepartment/a882/
No, you ensure your systems have the latest version of flash (it's easy, it comes as a deployable MSI) and you should be fine. If your network is put at risk by a flash ad you already are in trouble.
One... (lick)  Two... (lick)  *chomp*  Three!
3 minutes to boot?  What is wrong with your computer?
Genius
Yes, "Once the full range of such possibilities is taken into account, Pascal's argument from comparative expectations falls to the ground. The cultivation of non-rational belief is not even practically reasonable."   'The Rejection of Pascal's Wager': http://www.geocities.com/paulntobin/pascal.html
What I love about Transformers is that it is action packed and great entertainment, plus Megan Fox is not too bad to look at. Sure to be a summer hit!
Don't encourage them.
Leaving only the Americans as agents for peace? *shudders*
[Like this!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JkBSkFyUyv0)  Planet Earth is a great show.
If I chose to believe with that kind of motivation I would lose my integrity and self-respect.
There have been several computer manufacturers that have sold linux PCs for several years now.  System76 readily comes to mind.
That's one reason I like working a regular work week (M-F 8-5) at a place where it's not going to hurt anyone if I'm gone for a few days.  (Being able to work remotely doesn't hurt either ;)
I knew that Dianne Feinstein was an idiot, but idiocy notwithstanding, this makes no sense.
They also make flushable cloths for cleaning the toilet with. Full of win, I bawk at the idea of putting a cloth once used for that to any other use, even after surgical sterilization. 
you could also hardly regard such "belief" as sincere.
standard rasta illa, from the 2004-2006 collection, straight tubes are classic, but illadelph is over priced but so so so classic
You need to go back and read Matthew before you make any more comments about peace and love. Just skip straight to chapter 10.
Oh, how I despise the edited versions played in syndication on some channels.  Same goes for the edited south parks they play in syndication anywhere other than on Comedy Central
Without a doubt, my first wife.
yeah, sorry linked to different page.  &gt;After the British burned Washington, D.C. and the Library of Congress in August 1814, Jefferson offered his own collection of books to the nation. In January 1815, Congress accepted his offer, appropriating $23,950 for his 6,487 books. The foundation was laid for a great national library. Today, the Library of Congress' website for federal legislative information is named THOMAS, in honor of Jefferson.[35] In 2007, Jefferson's two-volume 1764 edition of the Qur'an was used by Rep. Keith Ellison for his swearing in to the House of Representatives.[36]   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thomas_Jefferson#Interests_and_activities
&gt;But there are plenty of things other than the Bible that are uplifting, educational or entertaining.  Personally I would never think of the bible as "uplifting, educational or entertaining"...
From an earlier post: It's a convenient issue to rally around. I think church leaders instinctively understand all this. For instance:  - It's divisive and creates an 'us vs them' mentality.   - It will never disappear, which makes gays a better enemy than the Reds, or whatever.  -  It's a really simple issue compared to, say, the bailouts or even creationism in schools.  - It's a sexual issue so it's easy to make people uncomfortable with it. And almost everyone has the occasional homosexual thought (however inconsequential), so homophobia is an easy thing to cultivate.  And so on.
&gt;PANAMERICANA SCHOOL OF ART: How far does your creativity go   fav
Holy crap, people actually play speedball? I thought my gym teachers had made it up because they hated me!  For the uninformed...  ###Rules of Speedball  Speedball is played on a basketball court. Speedball is a mix of one part football (soccer), two parts basketball, and one part weapons-grade stupidity.  - You may use any part of your body to move the ball downcourt. - If the ball has touched the floor since the last person struck it, you must get it into the air and catch it. You may not pick it up directly off the floor. - Once the ball is in your hands, you must not move around. You have to pass or shoot the ball.  This game is absurd. And there may be some hidden rule regarding the balance of teams - that is, the least athletic people are always up against the most athletic. Fairness is for nerdy pussies.  I hate that game.
If they'd been doing speedballs, they'd have been totally mellow with each other.  At least until they ran out of drugs.
I have two questions, I'll just write em up and see what happens.  1) I do not think highly of financial types, especially the i-banker wannabe's surrounding me in college. Jaw-droppingly immature. Downright dumb. However, they're so driven to have your job they make the grade and sweat the hours to make it to intern and beyond. Please tell me the people you work with are A+ people, because watching our future financial managers has convinced me to never give you guys the benefit of the doubt. Ever.  2) My understanding is that a lot of what you do involves convincing companies to merge together, which involves imaginary numbers and ideas like "synergy." Honestly, how much of this bullshit? Can you honestly say your firm benefits your clients, or are companies getting chopped up for the ambitions of the pricks I talked about above?
"Experiences missed out" do you mean like abortion and the chance to be gay? 
"...In each of the four major pandemics since 1889, a spring wave of relatively mild illness was followed by a second wave..."
I think, if there is a God, He will know the difference. 
looks great, except the sand vacuum cleaner
Sounds good to me!
"Hamas choose this battle ground"   What horse shit.   Both sides are wrong in this fight.
That's the current section leader of the Stanford band's alto's right there!
ManBirdPig, Bacon lung, and now hamdemic. reddit has delivered nothing but gold in the face of a bleak topsy turvy future where the flu kills young adults and bacon has poor connotations.
you mean **church goers**.
Kintaro Oe turned evil!
I have to disagree.  If you want to produce Star-Wars quality graphics, and if you want to hire movie stars to do voice-overs, and if you want to hire 20 creative co-directors and 20 managers per programmer to manage your project, then YES, it does cost a lot.  A good RPG costs more than tetris to make, I agree, but it doesn't cost as much as many companies try to make us believe.  Shooters are harder to make because the goodness of a shooter comes from some very technically demanding variables.  For example there are no 2D shooters and no turn-based shooters.  So graphics performance is paramount to a shooter, but not as much for an RPG.  Atlus makes great titles with minimal graphics.  In fact Atlus has a long way to go to match OAngband or to match Dungeon Crawl Stone Soup games.  So there is a lot of head-room still left unexplored for the commercial RPG developers, who still, in all this time, haven't touched the high level of quality of the free RPGs, at least in terms of tactics and player-decisions impacting game play.
Between the bus, the MAX, biking and taking my car on a rare occasion it usually takes me 30 to 40 minutes to get anywhere in Portland.  I lived in the suburbs and now in the NE.  While the roads are confusing at first, Portland is admired for its city planning, and I think the city is laid out just fine.  I find it ironic when cars are stuck behind a biker for miles.  If they were biking to begin with, there would be no problem.  Portland is a rugged place where people oftentimes fair rough elements, heavy traffic and elevated terrain for the sake of biking.  It's truly something to behold.
What are they teaching you folks in church these days?  What a threat to traditional american values, clearly, we need less churchgoing in this country. 
It's labor day here too, so it's a long weekend.
The OP did ask for the most ghetto starting 5 :)
[Citation Needed]
Yes. It's a common trait with people that far left of the Bell curve.
No. I hoped this was real and was calmly imagining what the world would now be like. The errors honestly struck me more than the info.  
This is what I think:  We should evaluate why people commit suicide. Now, for the rest of this Ill make a crazy assumption that people that commit suicide do so to avoid future suffering or lack of joy. This may or may not be true, and is certainly a generalization.  Now, "suffering" is inherently vague. All different kinds of people need and want all kinds of different things. I could suffer because my car broke down and I cant drive to the movies anymore (and I really wanted to go to the movies) while someone else could suffer physical torture, two drastically different kinds of suffering.  If suicide is a method to avoid suffering, then  suicide should never go away (completely) since people will always be suffering, and someone will always think suicide is the best way to avoid that.  The rates of suicide only reflect how fast the suffering rates are changing.
This guy needs a wife.
Possessed by the dark side are you?  Or merely an ideological slave to the left or right?  Sorry, I checked your profile. Zionist troll. Cute login name though.  See [Mearsheimer and Walt](http://books.google.com/books?id=KrR_00AxrUcC&amp;dq=mearsheimer&amp;printsec=frontcover&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=gB3Uy0aQi1&amp;sig=2LSP8WDCUfw2Aq3gsBUbdmzt0Ds&amp;hl=en&amp;ei=Fl76SeTMGIWmM-Ws1a0E&amp;sa=X&amp;oi=book_result&amp;ct=result&amp;resnum=5#PPR5,M1) for all the evidence one needs.
BAM!! Average bamming ability!
&gt; I think it's great that they are trying to diminish the stigma associated with tattoos  Why?
I'm just picturing a Giant real life Sweet Tooth vehicle barreling down the track playing it's music and wrecking havoc on all of the other cars. Maybe that is just me though...
This is intellectual masturbation.
Really?
Yeah. I mean if your web app depends on being able to distinguish red from green, you already failed.
any mirror?
we could have set genres for each week i.e. first week is non-fiction, second is sci-fi/fantasy, third is fiction, fourth is ?  and one thing I wanted to note is that alot of people found our way here because of this : http://www.reddit.com/r/scifi/comments/8grm4/the_new_reddit_book_club_needs_scifi_suggestions/  which might help explain this particular thread's focus on sci-fi. It at least gave *me* the (apparently wrong) impression that the idea that the first book would be sci-fi had already been decided.
no it saves it to the clipboard in bitmap. you can then save/edit as you please.
I really am.
You wish you could *nail* her.
Who else saw the shoe and spent the rest of the video looking for Dane Cook as one of the victims?
Well, Gitmo being open is not a violation of US law, nor is it a violation of human rights, as long as it's run as a simple prison and not a let's-hide-everyone-let's-torture-everyone place.  That's exactly my point.
And really, we ignore those stories even when there is not an outbreak... Swine Flu gives us an excuse to ignore the,
You know, The more I learn about how Christianity has set us back, the more determined I am to remove it from decision making in my life.
hat tip [vajav](http://www.reddit.com/r/crime/comments/8gr0m/woman_charged_with_exposing_self_to_2_kids/)
nationalize for a small fraction of that money  then democratic reform to minimize bureaucracy  libertarian socialism
You're facing a mandatory appointment with Dr. Darwin.
&gt;If It Bleeds, We Can Kill It  Tell that to my wife and her Aunt Flo.  ZING!
I have but only one up mod to give you, I am sorry.
Yeah, I suppose for this case with the vending machines and such, but still holds true for other things that are outlawed in restaurants and other private property.
This was a redditor for sure:  &gt;Partner's guesses:  &gt;windows, 31, ui disaster, why i use a mac, suckage, window, xp, ui, gui, form, web, browser, wtf
It's good to be consistent about these things.
Believe it or not, we model many of these scenarios. Likely the most dangerous would be to release a poisonous or infectious substance on the conveyor belt where one places luggage, ensuring the next 20-50 people to go through that line would come in contact with it. The reason this is most dangerous is because it's repeatable; someone could keep doing it across the country and never be caught.  Next, depressurizing a plane is the most dangerous, as it threatens the lives of everyone on the plane. Explosives and guns are particularly effective for this.  Ostensibly the first scenario I presented is why the liquid ban is still in place, even though that makes absolutely no sense.
I cant defend thibit.  I dont know thibit.  He or she is probably complaining like libertarians always do, but again I dont know.  My first post is kind of like his.  It was mainly in jest. I said: &gt;It should come out of Barack's paycheck. To continue: &gt;So b/c i dont word parse quite as good as you, therefore im a republican? Absolutely not, it is why I added a "?".  It is just aggression has a specific meaning to me and many and maybe most libertarians..  It is thuggery, theft, fraud and unwarranted violence like unnecessary wars, etc. I apologize for any insult. &gt;Did you remember what you just typed eariler? If i think that the gop and dems are false, why would you ask if i am in the gop? Again, the way you defended aggression.  From Rand to Rothbard, non-aggression is a pretty core libertarian principle. (yes I know Rand was not really libertarian as she expressed contempt for the movement but she is associated with libertarians on the right because of many of her beliefs) &gt;Its hard to disengage mentally from the left/right way of thinking if thats all youve ever known Agreed. Edits.
I use my mobile phone - Nokia's have a nice little feature where you can select which days the alarm will go off - and which they wont.... nice.
http://www.federal-resume.org/gs-levels-explained.aspx
I counted 7 of the Top 20 to be...face masks.  Wimps...I bought masks to protect against nuclear, biological, and chemical agents. Why not be hard core?
Um, the only reason Dems are refusing to prosecute is because the Republicans are threatening political gridlock if they do.
dead on
Remember this fucking video, she's going to regret it...  She clearly says in this video "we did not torture at gitmo, is corrected (attempt) by the person interviewing her, and then she says (very aggressively) "no we did not torture!".  au contraire, doktor!
&gt;I prefer how GIMP and the Linux kernel do it, where there's some sort of method to it rather than "Oh I guess we've gone too long without a major release, let's bump the version number."  The kernel's version numbering is a least as broken - Linus has said he never wants to move back to the old model, so the 2.6 part of the version number is essentially fixed and redundant.
But if you do not need infinite resources, then why assume you have more than one if you are presented with only one example (the existing universe)?
You know, if you talk to someone for years and one day realize that you've not heard a single word in reply or get any sign whatsoever that the person you're talking to even exists, then it dawns on you that you've been talking by your own damn self.  That's how it happened for me.
Then why the hell do Chrysler need a fucking bail out loan from Uncle Sam. Would the U.S. tax payers getting the loan money plus interest back?
Yeah, I definitely had mad respect for him after that.
It reminded me of the 3, 2, 1, contact intro.
Is her name Barbara? Tell her I said hi.
Right, got that. I was asking Billy to clarify his original intent. If I could invent a way to convey inflection on the internet I would be richer than bill gates. 
ps - i have the documents! we're one day closer to victory! let me get tyranny buster 9000 (or whatever he calls his MEGAPHONE) offa ebay! Take that new world order!
Wow, I kind of want that.
I try not to let logic get in the way of a stupid joke.
I know what you mean. In terms of the language i do feel it was directed, but i feel it was more to emphasize the kid who got picked on and then charged's viewpoint. The emphasis on white student repeatedly kind of helps create the seperation between the kids while in school, making it an even more stunning conclusion when the other kids showed solidarity. Though i do agree with you that the language was intentional and directed-i.e. not the best journalism- i think the level of respect shown to the reader through a lack of censorship is still commendable and doesn't require better writing to be appreciated..you know what i mean?
Survival mode stopped being fun when everybody found the exploits on each map and forced the entire team to use them or get kicked.. Let people play a game however they want I say.
Get the Republicans to back down with their threats of mutually assured destruction, and he will. 
Blasted! I've been plannig to do something similar for months now, except I would actually have registered a convincing domain like *static.news.bbc.uk.co*.  
Excellent review of Ultimate Fisbee  a fantastic sport that is gaining in interest.
[Pac-Man Vs.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pac-Man_Vs.)
If you could find someone to transcribe the characters it might help :)
They'd still be called Republican, but they'd be known for much better works.
That shortcut used to fuck with me so bad in Firefox before I knew how to reset the text size (Ctrl-0).
&gt; If you were to actually create something, then you would see them quite differently.  How fucking absurd!  I create all the fucking time!  I write code for a living.  And what do you think this post is?  It is creative and valuable.  I am going to ignore the rest of your trash from now on.  You just can't seem to add 1+1, so no point in talking to you.
Yeah, seriously. It's ironic really, given the past history of the Jews, that they would be so easy to demonize.
Don't mention it, but please use your newfound powers wisely.
I wonder if they're also wearing their business socks
Look into Warhammer 40K: Dark Heresy.  It's the tabletop, personal version of the big minis game, with a really deep, complex scifi universe that has a lot in common with Dune.  Ethereal pilots of starships battling through the evils that lurk in hyperspace, strong HR Geiger aesthetic.  If you want to be an ass and steal the books, look here:  http://lolkeylogger.cn/Roleplaying%20Books/Warhammer%2040k/  (though share the negative karma with me, as I hosted it).
my gf usually regrets statements like "whatcha thinking about?"
Also... I have to be able to move the thing myself (with a dolly or something).  Set your sights lower, Good somewhat big and fireproof do not relate to ease of moving.
"Never gonna log you out..."
Actor refers to any person who acts. We have no "actron" in the lingo to refer to both or either sex.
While at one time I would have agreed with your point, I do no longer.  Here's why:  My first site (circa 2000) was a site designed to sell products.  It looked OK and it functioned.  It actually made its first sale within the first 30 minutes it was "open."  But after creating 2,800 static pages over 2 years (I didn't know any other way) I was still making money but any change to the site--like a phone number or address--had to be changed on hundreds of static pages.  The reason for the specs I gave the developer were to ensure future changes would be simpler and the site would continue to be forward compatible for as long as possible.  In my thinking a site that doesn't validate today is not necessarily going to fit the norms a year or five from now.
And I live in Texas, so they don't tell you anything! :P
I don't know how law works in Japan, but I suspect it works somewhat like it does in the US, where after the arrest there is an investigation, and then charges are filed against whoever has the least useful/connected lawyer.  So, yeah, if you're poor, disable your opponent and get the hell out of there, no matter who started it.
Another thing I once considered when thinking about how something could possibly shrink without losing its molecules is this:   what if the actual size literally just reduced? Not like the author said with a decrease in space betw. the nucleus and its electron cloud, but a decrease in that space and in the physical size of atoms. I know it sounds ridiculous, but being science fiction maybe a way was invented.
I will not be participating. I prefer to remain anonymous, but I would like to see who else is in reddit around.
thats just wronggg
Dumb as hell.  Stupidest postings ever.  It's a shitter.  Who cares?
&gt; As for drug laws, that's not malice. It's a misguided sense of conservative christian morality. They don't say, "I want to fuck some people over, so let's pass this law." They say "It seems like the moral thing to do".  The difference in this concept that the system is kind of a runaway but ultimately non-sentient machine that destroys lives, vs. some kind of malevolent, conscious monster, is kind of irrelevant in the final analysis.  If indeed government is a machine which runs amok as much as it does, it deserves a wrench thrown into it.  &gt;Because it's their job. They don't make the laws, they enforce them. Don't hate on police for doing their job. (For the record, most police don't fuck with people with a small amount of pot. Most don't care).  Really?  I've never been arrested, am a straight looking guy, no record, and cops are belligerent assholes to me well over 70% of the time.  The job itself seems to attract bullies.  I got screamed at by a cop once for having my brights on on a remote stretch of desert road where I hadn't passed a car in about 45 minutes and didn't even remember I had them on (the lack of buildings and trees in the desert makes it easy to forget since they don't reflect back your high beams).  This guy was actually threatening to arrest me over high beams.  And this has been a *typical* experience of mine.  Most cops are jagoffs.  It's not that there are a few bad apples.  It's that most of them are bad apples and a few of them are professionals.  I don't need them to be friendly to me, but at least be businesslike.  As for pot, that's hilarious.  I know about a dozen people with bullshit penny-ante pot charges on their record both in New Jersey and Arizona.  Cops enjoy being dicks, and they specifically enjoy being dicks about technicalities and small-time bullshit like weed.  With all of the abuses of police power, I have to question the morality of anyone who would become a cop knowing they would have to screw people over like that, based on the law.  I used to be sympathetic to police - until I had to deal with them.  &gt; Don't sensationalize. You might read a story here or there but that doesn't mean that it's the norm.  My experience says differently.  I have been harassed for standing in parking lots at night looking up at the moon.  I get harassed in my own development for walking on the sidewalk past a certain hour.  (The cop actually said to me, "You could be one of America's Most Wanted!" - a direct quote.  I could tell you about the "gender of the pork" incident with another cop but that's a whole other story.)  I want police to be the guardians of public safety that they pretend to be.  I want them to be Dudley fucking Do-Right.  But that just hasn't panned out.  I'm sure police like to think they're professional public servants, but to me, they've mostly - not all, but mostly - been dickheads.
as someone that had their bag searched twice on the way to work, im actually quite happy. it maybe cost me 5 mins of my time but i'd rather the police did something rather than nothing! now downvote me
I think it's time to rape and forcibly impregnate and rape mike galanos
Did anyone else read to this part?  *"I think I'd like for him to stay there for a while. I'm obviously not set up here to keep him, though I've tried," Weaver said. "I have another son, 8 years old. My fear is next time he gets in the car, he might take his little brother."*  His father is leaving him in San Jose.
Thank you for that. I'm not counting anyway, but He is. 
Before he was pope and before he knew this was going to happen?
Because everything in the universe is causal, and therefore something must have caused the Big Bang.
Your school is actually doing it WRONG. Properly configured via group policy, IE can be secured. Firefox, on the other hand, is subject to whatever settings the current user chooses which can be more or less secure than your school's IT policy dictates. Sadly, they don't tech this at ITT Tech...
Absolutely it should.  After reading his quotes, it's clear he's not just against the Obama administration, he's against the Constitution. He needs to get a little visit from the FBI.  You know... stop by and have a little *chat*.
It's just that we are so fat we can't get laid.
It's the sort of statement you write when you want to give the impression that you've refined every aspect "even the shutdown music" in order to gain performance... when all you've really done is strip off the cow shit that has been baking on top of the OS since Win2K.
your momma.
I've been into games since I was a kid. My father and I would "bond" playing SNES and the Genesis. Then I moved onto the PS1 and N64 and I loved those. By the time I got a Gamecube and PS2 I was pushing my early teens. I used to spend hours playing. Now here I am, ready to head off for college. I own all three systems (I work at Gamestop) and a solid PC but all these "Next-Gen" titles don't really seem to capture me. The only games I play regularly would be Warcraft III, Halo, and an assortment of rhythm games.  The worst part is that when I try to revisit some of the old games I loved, they feel dated. Granted, a few classics shine through with their gameplay (Either that or they were totally in 2D), but a game that I remembered to be absolutely breathtaking aged into a piece of the past. It's not like I don't like the new games. I still have some fun playing them. I guess I'm just looking for something to enthrall me, something that will get me hooked for hours. That could be it. Or is it just that I'm getting older?
Of course, and don't forget worshiping Satan and kicking puppies, wearing clothing made of two different materials and questioning the existence of one 'Holy Spirit'.   *sigh* Good times. 
Barry Goldwater was a better guy than most give him credit for:  "Extremism in the defense of liberty is no vice. And moderation in the pursuit of justice is no virtue."
I don't have amenorrhea. My cycle's irregular but I've never missed more than two months.
If he's mocking hip-hop-bling-bling I find him cool too.
Tom Friedman makes the specious argument that Obama should not prosecute those guilty of torturing detainees, because, well, it would be difficult.
And we would be labeled anti-semites for grumbling about this.
Issue a chargeback via your credit card/debit card institution and get your money back.
Hella means he be from the Bay Area
The little girl looks like a thunder cat.
the googles would like a word with *you*  http://www.weirdasianews.com/2008/04/03/singapore-superhero-batman-bin-suparmen/
&gt; and women will love you for it.  Doubt that part. I don't play games and generally spend my spare time on constructive efforts yet I've never been very popular with girls/women. It's really a matter of self confidence and wit which I just don't have that much of.
I'm looking for examples of cities that use technology to more efficiently interact with citizens. Specifically things like discussion forums where citizens can track ongoing issues, or use the forum to coordinate with other citizens and build ideas to help improve city processes. I know there are pros and cons to discussion forums - so if there are studies or examples, I'd love to see both sides (things that worked as well as things that didnt work)  About  a year ago I got a job working inside my local city government and (no, I'm not surprised) its astounding how old school some of the processes and procedures are. I'm trying to do my best to generate change and be an engaged citizen - but upper management is very resistant to new ideas. 
Had a strange reaction to this song; actually got a little choked up. Fantastic.
if only we had someone who could make a visual basic interface?
&gt;Pixel measurements have been made to show they are falling faster than free-fall. You've been debunked, dumbass!  LOL.  Now that's just funny. You have to post that link, I have to check that out!
Oh my god
It depends on what is traded and how that is connected to its supply or demand networks.  You can average it all out but that throws away information that can become an indication of fractal expansion.
I feel retarded. I just ran through the house screaming about zombies to my uncle and brother and even "proved" it by showing it's on the BBC website. Then I read the URL. &gt;.&lt;
If you say mean things about us, we're not going to let you guide our peace talks? That's really a position?
I've figured that by now.
the Church has also paid $76 million in compensation.
There are probably multiple causes. None of them has been pinpointed as the one direct cause, but there are several things associated with higher incidence in a population, including that swine flu vaccine, and the meningococcal meningitis vaccine. 
[There it is](http://users.hal-pc.org/~joejr/32dohs.html)
Ninjas could not be reached for comment.
&gt;But if you do not need infinite resources, then why assume you have more than one if you are presented with only one example (the existing universe)?  I actually have no idea what you're asking here. Would you mind clarifying your question?
Comedy gold right here.  I haven't laughed this good in a little while.  Very good humor.
I wanted to comment just for that, but I'll upvote you instead.
The fact that fish feel pain is obvious. To attempt to equate it with human suffering is problematic though. A fish feels pain as soon as the brain tells it to. A human anticipates pain, adding the pain of emotional stress to the physical respionse. A human also adds more stress through worrying about future events. Suppose a fish is about to be swallowed by a large shark. Something happens in the little fish's brain that tells him to flee. This response works even if this is the first shark the fish has ever seen, so it must be some sort of genetic response. So you can say the fish is stressed out, but its stress is only situational. If the shark were to go away, the fish would go right back to happily feeding. Now let's put a man in the fish's place. The man, if bitten, is not only going to know pain then, his mind is playing out all manner of horriffic scenaria prior to any attack. He also worries about who will take care of his family when dead. The loss of all kind of future events, the end of things, plays on the man's mind as painfully, if not more so, as anything the shark might do. So, I can't see fish pain equalling human pain. Addition to pain is the price we pay for human consciousness.
I feel a Godwin coming on.
*some* cops? wow you are naive.
It's not just that so much of the show consists of flashbacks and references. It's that sooner or later the new people watching it won't get a lot the references, and suddenly most of the jokes will be replaced by these boring random bits. So we're probably the only generation that will ever think the show was good.
AOL
Gee, where could that have come from? Let's see...the building was clad in aluminum. Then there was that big friggin plane that was mostly aluminum. Then there were those tons and tons of aluminum that was being used for everything from office furniture to electrical wiring. Hmmmm.....  So should we be surprised that they found aluminum?
Whatever you do, have an inspection done before you even think about buying. Also talk to the police about the neighborhood. I have a friend who has a construction business.  He was lucky in W. VA.  He bought a whole neighborhood (11 houses) in W VA and fixed the houses.  He made his money back after selling the third house.  He tried buying a house in Detroit.  He had an inspection, but did not talk to the cops.  He bought the house for $5000.  He spent nearly $30k before he hired a demolition crew to destroy it.  The wiring got stolen twice.  The pipes were stolen.  He threw in the towel when the power meter had to be replaced.  He ended up losing over $50k, and he is experienced at rehabilitating trashed properties.  Check with the cops about the area first, or just avoid Detroit altogether.
Yes, and everything that's given by government must be taken away from another.
Good quote by Bill Gates in there:  &gt;we consider Linux a competitor in the student and hobbyist market.  You know, that seems to be true so far.  Hope it turns out to be wrong, but I don't see 2009 as "the year of the Linux desktop!!!11!" for anyone other than a handful of vista haters migrating for a few months to check it out.
Its a swine flu symptom.
Yes yes, we are all as angry as you.  But you forgot to laugh.  This was a good joke.
&gt;&gt;I don't get where their main platform is homophobia  I actually agree with you, homosexuality isn't their main platform, but even if it makes the list of the average Christian's top 10 social issues (and I think this is likely) that's still pretty absurd.  How about this question - why is it a defining issue at all?
http://tech.yahoo.com/blogs/null/107092 http://current.newsweek.com/budgettravel/2008/04/security_has_the_tsa_stolen_fr.html
They lied or just didn't know.  There are no REAL ID compliant states yet.  Any government issued photo ID is acceptable. If they give you a hassle about it, ask to speak to a supervisor. PITA, I know, but that's life and bureaucracy.
I do not hold any faith and I find that my life has plenty of meaning.  The meaning of my life is whatever I give it.  Love plays a huge role in my life and I find it is very important-but other people don't value it as much as we do.  I'm not sure we've agreed faith can't be investigated.  Granted, some definitions of god can't be, but faith in general has no limits.  You can actually go out and look for the loch ness mosnter, or devise an experiment to see if astrology works (it doesn't) etc.  I agree god is messier, but as a rule faith can be investigated.  Faith can mean belief without evidence OR IN SPITE OF IT.  I say it's better to believe things that are true than false.  If believing something false gives a positive effect then it's not from the belief (because it's false) it's from a 3rd party source.  It is better to find that source than to attribute the source to something that is not real.  On the last point, love is a big reason of what being a human is all about.  However, much like god, love has many different meanings and feelings to each individual.  Some people's love means letting their son freeze to death in the cold because they are an alcoholic.  I know that doesn't sound like love to you-but that's the point.  Much like faith, it is subjective and not an authority on guiding society.  I do think it plays a large, important role.  The best way to promote peace and prosperity is to agree on reality.  Subjective experience has no place dictating what others should do or believe.
what kind of CPU do you have?
I'm sure English probably isn't his first language but hot damn. I thought it was only English people who spoke louder and think it constitutes into translation. I was wrong.
If I were a technician and I needed an excuse to switch to Firefox that most wouldn't understand..
How the fuck is political protest a social injustice?  
They are two different pictures.
Dream Theater was my first rock concert in the very early 90's, it contained the best drum solo ever.
I like to know what I am eating, and I would like to know what makes up my dollars. I have a great deal invested in our United States Currency and our banking system. Knowing what is going on will help me decide if I should live/invest further in the USA.   I always think what was the deciding factor when somebody left their native country. 
More:  http://hosted.met-art.com/met-art_as_260_514//full/met-art_as_260_13.jpg http://hosted.met-art.com/met-art_as_260_514//full/met-art_as_260_18.jpg http://hosted.met-art.com/met-art_as_260_514//full/met-art_as_260_12.jpg
Voted up for the thing about volleyball nets.  Funny shit.
Look at it closer, it's telescopable.
yes.
150 years old and still never a dull moment in Temecula Valley, Southern California Wine Country. "If you have never experienced Temecula Valley, the region has something to offer everyone," says Kimberly Adams, President and CEO of the Temecula Valley Convention and Visitors Bureau. 
Holy shit that took forever. It was worth it.
Very cool.  
Actually, no, read the links.  The resistance to an infection thats *already present* can lower with temperature decrease, but if youre healthy you can only get sick by contamination:  &gt;  [] experiments so far have failed to produce evidence that short-term exposure to cold weather or direct chilling increases *susceptibility* to infection [] [my emphasis]  And no, there arent cold viruses everywhere you have to be in contact with another infected human being to get the virus.  The *sole* reason people get colds more often in winter is because they spend more time indoors, close to other humans, with less airflow.  Also you get the virus through the nose or mouth or eye, not through the feet or exposed arm (washing your hands after spending time with your sneezing friend is [good cold prevention](http://www3.niaid.nih.gov/topics/commonCold/transmission.htm) wearing warm clothes is entirely unrelated).  There are like half a dozen reliable studies for this cited by that wpedia article alone; if youre going to contest please provide evidence.
because Nut Job Christians will believe anything you tell them. 
Dualism, alone does not neglect the problem because it still needs to explain the existence of our universe.  Secondly, if this other plane of existence is not subject to causality ( a mighty fine claim by the way )it could never decide (we're talking about a place of minds right?) to do anything.  Either in or out of time, the decision of a personal agency to commit an action happens antecedent to the action itself. This means that there must exist a series of antecedent causal events in the mind of a time-transcendent being, if such a being exists. So an infinite regress of thoughts is required to come to a decision, since each thought is preceded by another.
let's see: take Friday off and start driving first thing in the morning. Get there about 10:00pm Friday night. Spend all day Saturday together...don't forget that includes Saturday evening, eh? ;)...then drive back Sunday!  WHALAH!!
I much prefer Seth's other show, American Dad.
Where is the "Pure Fucking Awesome" that you speak of?
I sense BAAWWWWWWWWWW
Original reference fail!
Although Caroline Wyatt couldn't resist pointing out that he'd removed his hard helmet.
Also, lurkers have to participate.  This site has over 4 million unique viewers per month and only 1/40th the number of viewers.  I was thinking orange ribbons might be cool too, but in [Canada they stand for addiction recovery](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Orange_ribbon)... which is sadly appropriate of my reddit experience, sans recovery
It depends on your needs.  If you need Oracle features in MySQL, most likely it will be cheaper to buy Oracle than it will be to engineer those features into MySQL yourself.  The same is true for any of the database engines.  There is a point where you might need millions of licenses, at which it would be cheaper to engineer those features into MySQL, but for most people that's not true.
You just posted this from your blackberry while operating a forklift though, right?
&gt; Again, the way you defended aggression. From Rand to Rothbard, non-aggression is a pretty core libertarian principle. (yes I know Rand was not really libertarian as she expressed contempt for the movement but she is associated with libertarism on the right because of many of her beliefs)  Im obviously not a true libertarian then.  Thanks for the explaination.
Exactly. Why would the computer make such a ridiculously complicated plan to kill someone. And how would AI ever come up with something so strange/complex? Computers are about efficiency.
Not all suicides are caused by depression. But I understand your point.
Or Russian ones.  Since far more seriously [Russia has recently warned the EU about the consequences of protests against the sovereignty of Moldova](http://www.straitstimes.com/Breaking%2BNews/World/Story/STIStory_361672.html).  Countries warn each other all the time, it's part of the wonderful world of diplomacy.  - [Britain among 5 nations warned by EU to cut budget deficits](http://www.smartbrief.com/news/cfa/storyDetails.jsp?issueid=A2F6A68E-F177-42F8-9BF5-2CB7E98B115A&amp;copyid=E476B3A7-33D8-4921-AAD9-634645B61BF6)  - [EU warns UK over Internet Privacy - Phorm.](http://www.ukcheapbroadband.com/broadband-blog/17234/eu-warns-uk-over-internet-privacy-phorm/)  - [EU warns China over increasing steel exports](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/finance/newsbysector/industry/5127401/EU-warns-China-over-increasing-steel-exports.html)  - [EU warns Germany over transparency](http://www.europeanvoice.com/article/2009/04/eu-warns-germany-over-transparency/64708.aspx)  Reddit just loves to freak out.
A pal of mine (I'm male) had to come off depo after two years because of weight loss. It's not unheard of to go either way apparently. 
Yes, and also a massive festering douchehole 
That's not the worst thing they did. Don't forget ten million people they burned alive (40-60K heretics, 7 to 11 million "witches").  Christians still burn "witches" in Africa. 
No surprise here. They've been supporting it for centuries. 
Yeah... that's how vaccines work. Idiot.
In some Caribbean islands (British Virgin Islands and I think others) the law actually *requires* any new construction to include rainwater harvesting.  The major islands have desalinization but for the smaller islands rainwater is the only source of water.  During dry spells water is trucked/ferried from the larger islands.  There are other demand mitigation techniques in place there too.  Especially on smaller islands it is typical for toilets to be seawater flush (it doesn't really matter).
Couldn't find anything on Wikipedia to support the 26,000 bunkers but apparently they have enough bomb shelters to accommodate 95% of the population. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Military_of_Switzerland#Shelters_and_fortifications
Well then you go ahead and be that guy who tips like shit and makes the rest of us look good.
:O
*outbreak outbreak*
http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/8gtci/ask_a_tsa_employee/c098dkf
Yes, I know that, do you not know a rhetorical question? The snipping tool allows you to actually save any sized portion of the screen you want by a cursor selection, then takes you to an annotation page.
I do this all the time and make all the labels block-level elements.  It drives me crazy now when I try to click on a label for a form element and it doesn't change focus.
&gt; I am still holding out hope that it will get better, but I enjoy it now and don't understand all the hate.  It's because its has all the ingredients required to be as good as AD and yet keeps falling short because of a stupid joke here and there.  That is a really interesting thing about AD, because jokes build off of each other you can find yourself laughing so hard you can barely breathe, but one bad joke in a sequence and the whole thing becomes a mild chuckle. SDSU has more than enough cheesy jokes to achieve that, though thats something that can easily change in later episodes.  Plus it was pitched as live action show, which you can tell while watching it, a couple of the lines would be way funnier if delivered by the voice actors on camera.  These are my issues with it, the reason it isn't popular with the general public is the same reason AD wasn't popular, too hard to follow, no laugh track, and a very specific brand of humor. If they wish to stay on TV they need to flesh out the characters better, I agree.
It's there now: &gt; Of course, it should be mentioned that Oracle now owns Sun and therefore controls MySQL.
&gt;Gee  not from vermiculite.  &gt;Vermiculite is commonly used as a fire-proofing material and was present in the WTC towers.
I heard my grandmother say "Applesauce!" a few times :)
I think it was a reference to AngryRepublican's username.  'Too bad he wasn't [right] about the [presidential] election'.
Does multiverse theory require an infinite number of universes or only an arbitrarily large number?
And the part about eating kimchi with everything.
Totally ambiguous answers...the best kind!
&gt;Because everything in the universe is causal  That's an assumption that need not necessarily be true; indeed, quantum mechanics supposedly argues that there are *plenty* of things in the universe that are acausal.  If *everything* in the universe must be causal, then you're inevitably going to find yourself in an infinite regress.
Anyone put their name to that kike crap?  How bout a byline.
I bike commute.  I travel at a consistent rate of 20-25 MPH.  How do I belong on the sidewalk?  Secondly, revoke your own license for not knowing that in all 50 states bicycles are considered vehicles and are to be ridden on the right of way except on limited access highways  (Eisenhower Interstate System.)  
&gt;Cuz it's a human emotion  Which is produced by a hormonal secretion...
You're on the No Fly list, congratulations.  There's no way off. Yeah, it's fucked.
This is NOT the right time to stop screaming, running around puling the hair out, wringing hands. Get serious people!
That title is one of the more illogical contrivances that I've seen within the past few minutes.
He is downloading Chinese TV show dramas and according to him, its over seas so it isn't illegal. I don't think he knows what Interpol is or what copyright is.
Oh. That I don't know. You might want to ask at various universities.
&gt; Unless you get stuck in back office, writing reports for a living. That sucks.  Yeah, this is important.  Finance is a pretty wide area.  Most quality programmers would like to get their teeth into those ABCs above, but most other jobs in Finance are much more boring.  I've worked for a couple of investment banks.  You wouldn't believe the amount of different legacy systems they have spread around the world all supported by different teams with their own political agendas.  The worst part is how slowly things get done when you're dependant on a team whose main focus is making your team look bad.  I'm not joking - I've seen this many times.
upvoting for "rich nigga teeth" that made my day
Rule #1: Stanford Students come prepared Rule #2: Don't mess with Waffles (first guy)
All you have to do to make the image stop moving is to cease scrolling over the page to find why someone thought this was interesting. 
That's what happens when you give kids [speedballs](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=speedball)
I wonder  what everyone's favorite Minnesotan Garrison Keillor thinks of this loony congresswoman.
So many David Bowie clones...
no.
This game is incredible and it really stresses me out on a core level. Exactly what I am looking for in a horror survival game.
Keep in mind that for the devoutly religious, an action is moral if and only if it is sanctioned by God; basically, if it's OK with God, it's a moral act, without any consideration of who is hurt by it or how.
I did that already. It didn't work. Thanks anyway.
1. panic 2. panic 3. panic 4. panic 5. panic
This is the 42nd comment to this post. Nobody post anything else!
Apparently, you, and the people who wrote that article and edit that page... are just EXACTLY as thick-headed as Gerald Ford. Let's see how long it takes you to figure out why I said that. 
As a bike commuter...I'm thinking there is a second part to this story.  
It's hard enough to explain to someone who doesn't play (and this includes financiers) why someone would want to live in a fantasy world of any design, but the appeal there lies in being able to create the closest thing to that reality (deep space travel, living in Star Wars or Conan's world, etc. etc.).  While I would play the shit out of a Roman MMORPG (with of course barbarian/rival empire servers at war with each other) the fact that those things have already happened make the appeal even less understandable. Why recreate history in a false sense when you can open any book and find out what happened? Not only are you wasting your time, you're not even fulfilling a "proper" fantasy!   Not that I believe that of course, but it's worth nothing.   WWI online would be cool, as would the aforementioned Roman Empire MMORPG (other servers for barbarian tribes like the Gauls, Persians, Carthage, and as far across the globe as the servers see fit to extend), also a Victorian Steampunk MMO, and an Age of Empires-esque Medieval MMO sans magic wouldn't be out of place either. 
Being a giant monster, I can say that these claims are accurate and my bane.
You're meant to be weeping and pretending to give a shit.
That's funny, I was actually thinking of taking a CSI angle on my comment in the first place :P
&gt;It only takes one or two draws on a crack pipe to get addicted to these drugs.  What does this have anything to do with crack cocaine?
You shout as loud as you can "YO EVERBODY COME CHECK THIS SHIT OUT!"
w000t can't wait!
Replied just so you could check out the color of that envelope
You're ignoring the user factor.  Computer illiterate people don't run servers.  Computer literate people don't get infected by virii, or if they do, they don't stay infected.  Thus, targeting servers is largely inefficient not only due to the fact that they're a small percent of computers and users but also because your chances of infecting one are nearly zero, not due to the OS, but due to the fact that your grandma and grandpa don't use them. 
Mirror please, it won't show for me.
You can have everything you asked for, except for the weight issue. If it has any decent amount of fireproofing and the size you want, there is absolutely no way you are moving it up a set of stairs by yourself. My brother has one that is about 3'6"x3' and it took 3 or 4 people to move it from his driveway into his house. Remember, this is a SAFE, not a closet. The basic design of these things all have an added feature of being extremely heavy. 
I've got those, I'm looking for more of a unique world setting that is a sword and sorcery (low fantasy) sort of setting, or maybe more of a Final Fantasy magic+tech sort of idea.
I've heard this argument before, but I don't buy it (no pun intended). You can "try" music on iTunes. You can "try" it on Last.fm. I wonder if those pirates who were 10 times more likely to buy music are buying what they've already pirated. Would they be 20 times more likely to buy music if they stopped pirating, or if it was not an option?  Those who pirate music are likely music fans, so sure they're more likely to buy music. Based on this fact alone, the study seems flawed to me.
See my responses regarding the DEA.
Lighten up; you'll probably be dead soon:(
Their "War Pigs" cover is great too.
Not me. See, I understand that I'm in a &gt;1-ton mass of metal traveling at high speeds, and pay appropriate attention to situations that require it, like for example when I'm with other cars on a highway. Apparently I'm not as important to others as they are to me. Outside their monkeysphere, perhaps.
I just thank them, sincerely, and get on with my life.
haha, you can see the auto focus light on his face.
Yeah, I agree with you 100%.  I could have been clearer on that.
...or we could outlaw morons like you not being able to pick up on context clues.  The site is at wordpress.  Did you think it was a portal for child social services?
Thanks, I know he's in a band. That's why the subby said  &gt;Ben Gibbard **of Death Cab for Cutie**  However, it was only one "asshole" who did the performing. He chuckled a couple of times. That doesn't mean that he blatantly said  &gt;haha, guys, I'm doing this as a JOKE  I think you just need to step back, take a few deep breaths, and **calm down**. Maybe you should punch a pillow or something.
I was being sarcastic. Its just a ploy to get a very annoying song stuck in your head.
Agreed, what would the "regulation" actually be?  Will it be treated like tobacco? so it is illegal for the common-person to grow, and can only be sold by giant manufacturers ala philip morris?   FUCK THAT SHIT.
'According to FEMA's website, Texas has been the site of 13 "major disaster declarations" since Perry took office... since FEMA's record-keeping began, Texas has received federal disaster assistance more times than any other state...'
Sponge Bob Square Pants!
I cannot find it ANYWHERE for some reason.  Can't find a link or even a mention of it on cbc.ca... tried googling but leading nowhere fast.  I MUST SEE THIS GAME! :)
*We're all grateful for our bacon lung.*
Most men are squeamish because they simply don't understand it. While splitting the girls from the boys in sex-ed makes a lot of sense for many reasons, they really ought to cover both sides to all kids. However, teenage boys being teenage boys they'd likely be asshats about it.
inside of the uk noone gives a fuck either
THIS HEADLINE IS ALL WIN. 
then nasa is a waste of our time
&gt;1. Stop eating carbs, sugar, and processed fats.   &gt;No carbs, no sugar, no starches, no bread, no pasta!  hmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmm
It's no surprise, people in cults do all sorts of weird and deviant things.
You have found the root paradox.
I think my point on motives has totally been missed here. The hate crime legislation has nothing to do with a motive determining whether the defendant is guilty or innocence. It is all about making a more heinous motive, a more heinous crime. Murder is terible crime when someone does it for personal gain or retribution. But when it's done to someone just because he/she is born a certsin way, it shows a motive that is fueled by hate.  
I use that one on my daughter all the time. . .
&lt;sarcasm&gt; Shocking - religious people having a "tongue-in-cheek" moment? Never!  &lt;/sarcasm&gt;
Your guess is as good as mine. Try asking a moderator?
For me its more the sleep factor. I usually smoke before bed to get a better sleep, without weed the first few nights can be hard, but its nothing to bad, just usually stay up later.
Bacon fever!
Logical consistency doesn't come with the territory of religious belief.
Hello dave   woot jhd gjdfjg sdkfgl sdjkfg klsdfgn jsdfng jkdsfn jksdfn jkdsfn jkdfn jdfnv jkdfnv jksdnv jsdn vjksdfv kjsdfv jsdf vsdfv sdfb sdfb sb sdfb sfd
That was fucking stupid. Trevor is hot tho....i want to suck his cock
There are people who don't have these things?
&gt;Seth Macfarland feels that with his success, he can push his viewpoints as hard as he wants  This.  Seasons 1-3 were about making a funny show.  Since then it has been about making statements.  Difference? Season 1-3 were funny, rest not so.
I'll try his twitter account. He's constantly updating. If you want to try too, his username is jephjacques.
This is Three Dog, Rooowwwwwww!  Thanks for listening chilllldren!
You already missed it, it was yesterday.
I hope someday Glenn Beck becomes a manager in the WWE.  It would be a perfect fit!
You mean if you chose to "believe" in God because of Pascal's Wager, then your motivations are not sincere, and therefore God won't accept that? 
&gt;After a large group of police officers interviewed the witnesses and the suspects they released the driver, who drove off **without a ticket.**  This after he deliberately drove into a group of cyclists? Huh? 
That's crazy. Scabs are delicious.
If the employees walk out, in an impoverished community, there will always be others desperate enough for food to take their place.
:(  That cuts deep, man.
"Allowed to be forced"?
Honestly, not much. I'd recommend Bioshock if you haven't played it on 360.
Out here in the fields.......
No, but seriously, posts like this make me cry. Stop submitting shit.
Pointers are good to know if you're programming in C, but you'll probably want to learn more than that.  Kidding aside, all you really need to do is find out what libraries are available to do what you want to do, and then program the rest. If you want to have a GUI, you should start by finding a GUI library. If you want to make a game, a good place to start are the many game libraries around.   Another way to learn is to see what real software projects are doing. Find a simple open source program and see how it's laid out.  What kind of project do you want to do? That would help us give better suggestions.
Make a little ceremony out of taking shits. Do a little song before like maybe "Yeaaaaahh gonna take a shit now" together with some electric guitar. Then When you do sit down on the toilet imagine you have actually trapped the person you hate the most in there and shit on him/her. Afterwards do a proper wiping and spend some cash on those wet anti bacteria tissues to really clean up really nice, so you can be happy about how good your ass smells.
i LOL'd
OMG A WHITE HOUSE PHOTO OP!!1
Come on reddit- you know that you don't need an ID to get on a plane, right? http://www.thetraveljunkie.ca/articles.php?articleid=146 no federal requirement- they just search you more.
Honestly, my major switch happened when I started using OCaml. Nothing else even came close to the support that Tuareg mode had.
I liked the part with the talking bears.
if she was a good sister she would have told her brother not to trust anyone from the GOP. 
I think the OP was trying to demonstrate the absurdity of Pascal's wager in a humorous way. Your response would seem to indicate that you didn't get the joke.
On the contrary, I can't remember a time in my life when I didn't majorly slack off.  Around 3, I was learning about how megatron transforms into a gun.
Everyone knows the funniest jokes are written in formal predicate logic.
I'd argue that that is not entirely accurate. Behaviors are likely complex mixes of genes, chemical balances, and environmental factors. Behavior doesn't have to be genetic, it just has to arise from a genetically derived foundation. That is to say, the basis for behavior is built via a complex of genes involved in the development of the brain, but the behaviors themselves may depend on such factors like how the brain tissue itself has developed (now known to be a large factor in intelligence) and the chemical environment of the brain.  If suicide were genetic, you'd see it passed down through generations. I'm not aware of any studies on this, but it would be an interesting area of study. Of course, it could be extremely difficult to control for environmental factors that would skew the results.
Soon.
"Installing update 9 of 103..."
Most of your leisure time sounds too repetitive and too passive. Try something you both might conceivably enjoy while at the same time breaking the rut. Go para gliding, sign up for dance lessons,  write a song together if you can. Even go hiking or (better yet) camping. Get outside of your comfort zone and there is more chance you'll bond together when you have to support each other. 
I dont live in the US but im sure if you ask any one that lost a loved one in the 9/11 attacks, if torture had been used and prevented the attacks, would they be ok with it? they would be.  I think the unfair thing about torture is that (if it works) we never get to see it work, as in it stops something from happening, that would have otherwise happened.   So what I'm trying to say is that, an act of terror that may have been stopped through torture, may have just saved your loved ones life, but we will never know. (lets see where this one goes...please dont down-vote just comment)
I miss Arrested Development. I just got my family hooked and we watched all three seasons in the time span of about a month, it made me even sadder it was gone. Watching this show brings back memories.  I wasn't aware it had pitched as live action, but I think it would have been really good if it had been. 
I think you are right.  When they bring back things like cutting away to Twitty or have the chicken fight for 5 minutes the joke is how ridiculous it all is.  It is all so absurd and that's the joke.  It all reminds me of a Wes Anderson film.
Transformers = piece of garbage for ten year olds. Retarded plot, retarded dialogue, bad acting.
When you'd rather people think you were a rent-a-cop employee instead of your current job, don't you think it's time to switch professions?
Pooh was best overall and eeyore was worst overall in my opinion. But I like Eeyore better than Pooh.
&gt;I think there is a difference between trolling and troll gangstalking, and it's evidenced itself on this sub-reddit.  So for example constantly claiming someone is a homosexual? 
Anyone who has been around birds for more than 20 minutes knows this already. My cockatoo use to shake her head up and down and mimic the sound of me brushing my teeth to the beat I would move it. 
You're so not a cool kid.
Google has about a million Linux machines and about as many network admins maintaining their safety.  How often have your programmer buddies who run Windows been infected with virii? For me? Never.  tl;dr it's not the OS, it's the users. 
&gt;1. Stop eating carbs, sugar, and processed fats.  &gt;No carbs, no sugar, no starches, no bread, no pasta!  lol adriyel is pretty much going through some hardcore ketoacidosis to be making this bullshit up.
Here, with some bonus guts to play around with:  http://www.dealextreme.com/search.dx/search.jukebox  Free shipping too!  Good luck escaping from dealextreme with your wallet intact.
Sadly, it seems you're correct.  I thought I phrased my argument coherently without being abrasive, and provided good supporting evidence.  Nevertheless, 8 hours later, I sit at -4 points...  reddit seems very close-minded today. =/
Sure, but the intermediate period of socialism before that was not necessarily stateless (by which I mean socialism in the sense that Marx used it, not all socialists).
&gt;Im obviously not a true libertarian then. &gt;Thanks for the explaination. It explains why I didnt understand what you meant.  I apologize again.
not this ACORN crap again
I loved Family Guy in it's first three seasons before it got canceled.  Since its come back, its been horrible, I always turn it off now.  None of the characters are likable anymore.  I'm not saying that because they're amoral and deal with controversial issues, It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia has amoral characters and deal with controversial issues, but they're all still likable.  Family Guy just sucks now in general.
Yes, but some of them (like Sealab and The Brak Show) are hilarious no matter what your state of mind.
and that is supposed to make it ok?  I don't think so.
Actually: [Bam](http://multilockon.hp.infoseek.co.jp/prog-gif/prog.htm).
"Never gonna turn around and reboot you..."
Is that right? I begin to recall a 60 person majority in the senate. Boy that really fucked up the democratic apologists didn't it. No more excuses for you. If only it had stayed at 59, you could have gone through the next 4 years and blamed every Obama shortcoming on the Republicans. But no longer. Thank you Arlen Specter.
Each of them chips in $30/month for the colocated web server that hosts all the Hulu content.
Only in the new seasons, it is becuase they lost their good writers and now more is on Seth.
Is that word OK to use now? Coz I always thought it was derogatory.
Doesn't inspire confidence in Gentoo.
&gt; less chance of infections  I don't see how. Sure, you get TSS with some of the other traditional things, but unless you are sterilizing this I can't imagine it is all that it is any less capable of picking up infection than the individually wrapped tampons.
We can start with [this](http://www2.parl.gc.ca/Sites/LOP/LEGISINFO/index.asp?Language=E&amp;query=5787&amp;Session=22&amp;List=toc).
Italy please do to them what you did with Mussolini
The courts select people from the general population to serve as jurors on civil and criminal trials.  The pool of people is usually taken from voting records, but also from tax returns, etc.  If you are selected for jury duty, you receive a notice in the mail to show up to a court on a specific date.  Once there, you are screened by the judge and lawyers.  The letter you see was part of a pre-screening process.  People with legitimate excuses, those who have ideological differences, or those that the lawyers don't think will be unbiased jurors are excused from the process.  Otherwise you sit in on a trial, listen to the arguments and testimony, and then come to a verdict with the other jurors.
[Pappa Chester's proud of you](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=boA5OlwwYuU)
Wash your hands once in awhile.
I'd Ad her Damnum
How about we compromise and have it say "I'll fuck him dead".
I have a job but i am saving it for San Francisco State. Also I can not work everyday because of child labor laws.  I have two options with the router. I can completely turn off his access to the router but he bought a new one because he thought it was broken. So my only option is to cap it.  There is a second problem too. His computer is connected directly to the modem. Anyway to somehow cap his bandwidth from the router?  
oh god it's true...
Did you understand what she tried to say in that line about the "bad actors"? I am still confused.
or just S-x.
Refactor, but only refactor the code that affects your current task. Breaking existing functionality because you attempted to refactor code you weren't working on is a disaster ;)  Also, [Working Effectively with Legacy Code](http://tinyurl.com/6m4uqu) has some good tips on getting tests on old/bad code.
NSFW!!
See my edit. Seems at least four states require seat belts.
Well considering most of them have a giant torture/execution device sitting on top of their churches or hanging around their necks, it's not hard to believe.
The control mechanism may be "context sensitive", it's chances of being given "active" to children increasing when the population needs to be reduced.  (Edit: Of course it could also be mostly psychological and only slightly genetic, it's not absolutely clear yet.)
Just because South Park makes straw men on both sides to make them look retarded does not make it "balanced".
Why doesn't this surprise me?
In other news software developers struggle to use 2 cores efficiently. 
*Eye 4-1* welcomes *R. Laser-Controlled*, human overlords.   Weight.   What?
Dammit, we lost another one.
IT'S GOIN RAIN!
yo dawg...  http://bg11.org/wp-content/uploads/birds_in_action_4.jpg
&gt;Oh for fucks sake, you could say that of any flu virus  This is what is not understood: H1N1 is a recombinant form of swine + avian flu or swine + human flu, or some kind of unknown combination. The form that 'Swine Flu' as we know it has taken on is a pandemic, hyper-virulent strain. The more people that get infected, the more the virus will be mutating. This makes it very difficult to treat with vaccines and it also certainly does make it more likely to become deadly. The thing about these modern epidemics we've seen, SARS, Avian Flu, Swine Flu, is that they're different from the 1918 flu. My understanding is that people were dying from bacterial infections which gave them pneumonia due to their weakened immune systems. Our current flus are different - the immune system entirely overreacts and causes the most healthy people to die, something that is entirely different from the common flu.  If the past teaches us anything it's that these pandemics have happened in waves. Over the last 10 years or so, we've seen a few waves, but we are troublesomely close to a serious situation here.
what about WoW players?
jemfinch typed, "It would seem, then, that the Gates of Hell prevailed against the Church for almost eighteen centuries, in contradiction of Christ's promise to the contrary." --- I did a search for keywords: **"[gates of hell prevail](http://scriptures.lds.org/en/search?search=gates+of+hell+prevail&amp;do=Search)"**.  I assume you were referring to Matthew 16:18.  Matthew 16:18 (In this statement, not a promise, the Lord's words are true.)  18 And I say also unto thee, That thou art Peter, and upon this rock I will build my church; and the gates of hell shall not prevail against it.  The search turns up these scriptures:  3 Nephi 11:39  Verily, verily, I say unto you, that this is my *doctrine*, and whoso buildeth upon this buildeth upon my rock, and the gates of hell shall not prevail against them.  D&amp;C 10:69  And now, behold, whosoever is of my church, and *endureth of my church* to the end, him will I establish upon my rock, and the gates of hell shall not prevail against them.  D&amp;C 17: 8  And if you do these last *commandments* of mine, which I have given you, the gates of hell shall not prevail against you...  --- 2 Thes. 2:3 (The old apostles new that before the Second Coming there would be an apostasy.)  Let no man deceive you by any means: for that day shall not come, except there come a falling away first. --- The priesthood was conferred by ancient ministers including Peter.  Joseph Smith History 1:72 (John the Baptist was first sent bearing the Aaronic Priesthood.)  72 The messenger who visited us on this occasion and conferred this Priesthood upon us, said that his name was John, the same that is called John the Baptist in the New Testament, and that he acted under the direction of Peter, James and John, who held the keys of the Priesthood of Melchizedek, which Priesthood, he said, would in due time be conferred on us, and that I should be called the first Elder of the Church, and he (Oliver Cowdery) the second. It was on the fifteenth day of May, 1829, that we were ordained under the hand of this messenger, and baptized. --- Doctrine &amp; Covenants 128:20 (The Melchizedek priesthood was recieved by the laying on of hands.)  ...The voice of Peter, James, and John in the wilderness between Harmony, Susquehanna county, and Colesville, Broome county, on the Susquehanna river, declaring themselves as possessing the keys of the kingdom, and of the dispensation of the fulness of times! --- I am wondering did these words sway you a little?
Considering they believe in unending torture for those who don't believe as they do, it's no surprise.
My girlfriend left me for that exact reason. I'm not upset about it, I feel it will be better in the end. It is a lose/lose situation in the short run but an exponentially greater win in the long run. I think most people regret more things they have not done in their life than things that they have.
Why would I have seen SQLTac?  Introspection, in terms of the stored procedures, views and tables available to programmers that allow an application to examine and build on knowledge of database structure.  What stored procedures exist, what database objects are dependent on each other.  I've used these to great advantage, in building systems on top of them.  All the open source databases I have seen and considered for personal projects, also do not have anywhere near the flexibility.
Satan is a corrupted Hebrew translation of the word Adversary.  "The enemy" they're referring to is most likely Satan.
shit i read the goden compass series when i was in middle school and i never really caught onto that. i guess if i think about it, it was there, but they were still very good books and made a decent movie (i mean, shit, it had daniel craig). whereas i thought CS lewis' books just kinda sucked and i don't think i ever saw the movie.
They seem to be a group not defined by christianity but by occupation, poverty, and having come to the city near the same time.  The fact that they are predominantly Christian is more a consequence of the swine herding, since Muslims cannot keep pigs.
Nobody's revelling in offense, and and people are talking about it specifically because it *isn't* just one talk at one conference one time.  Pretty much all these articles you are obviously avoiding reading would explain this to you, if you read them.
Ah, try reading the article.  Losing all electricity (only the worst-case - it's completely preventable) is hardly the end of the world.
I think games should come with a tool to swap form a pirate serial key to a legit one
Both. I used to work with them and, after having to sit through conversations of them justifying their fucked up control issues, I can safely say that "swine" is the most accurate way to describe them. I try to symphasize with them because according to them, they feel like they have to be this way, but they objectify anyone around them who isn't in uniform. It's scary.  I've had to read, watch and hear enough stories about cops doing horrible things to think that there's something wrong with the idea of cops and the very law enforcement system they're a part of in the first place.  So many parts are broken, it'd be better to just throw the machine away and buy a new one. 
i see what you did there
I love that joke building style, if done correctly its just too funny. So I'll keep watching SDSU until cancellation, even if it doesn't improve. Hopefully to keep that type of humor alive. Also to remind other shows (read: family guy) that a cutaway gag should be QUICK, something they used to understand but have clearly forgotten.
manufactured bullshit. if you're not a POW then you're a civilian. if you have no rank or serial number you're a *civilian*.  you can' go making up something in between in hopes of being able to legally torture somebody.  fucking dipshits.
Yea. I do not need that much, just enough to check Reddit and obsessionally play a game of L4D.  The problem is that I know nothing of networking and there are MANY choices of programs out there. Thanks for the advice. 
Hey, teacher, leave those sheep alone...  New Zealand, where the men are men and the sheep are scared...  ;-)
This is the music class at PS22. [This is](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tpXC4VVM-JQ) the same class singing "Joga" by Bjork. I think it was submitted in /r/music a few days ago, but I couldn't find the submission again. Here's the video though. They have all kinds of arrangements. There's even a Velvet Underground one in there somewhere. Tori Amos was impressed with one of their renditions of one of her songs, she came and sang with them.  Here is their blog: http://ps22chorus.blogspot.com/
Huh. Wasn't expecting *that*. Something along those lines, but not quite *that*.
TERR'IST FACEPALM!
&gt; I do not hold any faith and I find that my life has plenty of meaning. The meaning of my life is whatever I give it. Do you mind if I press you on this? I am at a loss to understand what meaning to life an atheist has? If I didn't have Faith in God, I'd become just a bunch of atoms and I feel that I would genuinely despair. Please don't take this as insult. I'm trying to understand.
What?  This is anti-communist propaganda.  What does this have to do with the world today?
Kirk Hinrich  Mike Miller  Kyle Korver  Matt Bonner  Chris Kamen
Reddit is Huffington Post central, so expect a lot of downmods. I personally hate huffingglue; a lot of politically motivated lies come from there, and this article doesn't surprise me one bit.   
Its a distinct marker of either incuriosity or a broken stupid filter. Both are deal-breakers when it comes to taking someone seriously as an intellectual.
i believed this was real until i read the comments on here. damn shame. been meaning to buy a crowbar.
Actually, no, I am not using subjectivity to prove objectivity. And I apologize for assuming you were a theist. Living in the deep south will do that to you.  Anyway, there is an evolutionary argument to be made for why it makes sense to treat people decently in a society such as ours. As well as an argument dealing with why it is undesirable to cause unnecessary pain to others. Honestly, I'm not a philosopher, and many people have fleshed these arguments out significantly more eloquently than I ever could. I'm the type of person who would rather try to prove these things mathematically, but alas, that doesn't seem to be the way to go about these things.   I actually never said that I "felt" something was immoral or "just knew" it was true. Like I said, look up some of the arguments I referenced. Regardless, arguments for morality from authority tend to be pretty weak themselves, and trying to prove objectivity from a necessarily *subjective* authority figure (that it to say, all gods are make believe, and therefore are subject to human error in their moral codes) doesn't end up working, either.  Cheers.
Wilt Chamberlain, Bill Russel Larry Bird, Michael Jordan, Magic Johnson
I wouldn't go as far as to say vertigo, but I do find it really strange.  It is as strange as actually believing the earth is flat.
More here: http://www.butterflysearcher.com/?page_id=2711
like forums? try this.
It certainly ain't Sea World.
Again, people tend to confuse actual damage versus potential damage.  The swine flu has the potential to be more deadly, and indiscriminate, while people who die of obesity are all fat (i.e. it is avoidable and does not rise or fall sharply).  If you make the argument that swine flu could never become a big deal and not be indiscriminate, you may have a point.  Until then, your point lacks at least some validity.
:)
&gt; The women traveled to Washington as part of a week of activism to raise attention about human rights abuses in North Korea, which is embroiled in a standoff with the United States over its nuclear and missile programs.  I wish I could get the CIA to pay for all my flights. :-/
Nice.  Here's a few:  http://www.flickr.com/photos/68625749@N00/2975617322/sizes/l/in/set-72157608386790552/  http://www.flickr.com/photos/68625749@N00/3056046619/sizes/l/in/set-72157609930915349/  http://www.flickr.com/photos/68625749@N00/3056859682/sizes/l/in/set-72157608986986825/  http://www.flickr.com/photos/68625749@N00/3065833143/sizes/l/in/set-72157610313419263/   Advice:  use a tripod and experiment with slow/delayed shutter speeds
Why does no one have Wilt?  What the fuck is the matter with you.
and [*Koala*Penguins](http://www.reddit.com/user/koalapenguin/)
Which OS?
WUT
Think of it as a good thing for the species. It prevents the passing of undesirable genes.
&gt;Is it more likely that Oswald shot JFK alone at super speed?  This is a grave misconception that has been thoroughly debunked and shown time and time again to be just plain fasle.   But don't take my word for it, watch [Penn &amp; Teller show you!](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=4554384376223562153)  *edit: mark-up fail*
meh. people who pray for me should burn in hell for interfering with their *god's* plan.
Try /r/Meetup. That is the subreddit for people trying to find users near them. I am pretty sure there are posts about boston
Nah, i dont think this is what the average male 4channer looks like.  Moot however does look exactly like the kind of kid that starts anime image board at the age of 15.  http://f.imagehost.org/view/0129/1239513971109
So people are still able to use win beta 7 on thier mini 9?  Anyone install it from an sd card or flash drive?
Schwasted.
1. Most BA/MBA grads are loaded with motivation, but intellectual capability spans the spectrum. By the 3rd or 4th year in, the dimmer bulbs that haven't found some sort of coping mechanism are weeded or burnt out.  The really smart ones have probably left because they can find nearly as money for a better quality of life.  So you're usually left with the B+ crowd, IMO.  2. I have two roles. Pitching and Executing.  During the pitch phase I try to convince a potential client that my idea is good and they should hire me.  A good deal of what I say is naive since there is no way I can know about as much about the industry/their business, as they do.  During the execution phase, the client makes the decision to sell/merger and its on their heads.  Blame the banker if you want but its the CEO/CFO/Board of Directors that have the real say on deals. 
Because Buddhists aren't actively working to overturn my liberties at home, condemning the use of condoms in AIDS-plagued Africa, preventing research that will increase our quality of life, and forcing public schools to teach unscientific nonsense in science classes, among other things.  Basically, their absurd beliefs don't affect me personally, so I see no reason to meddle in their affairs.
sad. sad. sad  what i dont understand is why people hate racism, but perpetuate stereo types like these.   reminds me of the movie [crash](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Mr-vqKH56w8)
*******************
[Any?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chalupa)  But that's beside the point... go to Taco Bell and you'll discover the chalupa has become a bastardization of Mexican cuisine (pushing calories and consumption) and it's probably responsible for more deaths than swine flu.   And no, the correlation between Taco Bell being "Mexican food" and Swine Flu originating in Mexico was purely coincidental. You could insert Big Mac, Whopper, etc. in the same place.
Most of the time, I do implement. PracticalPanda's very practical solution. However, since I don't want to dodge the question, I think I'd opt for one of the following:  I'm a sentence [and it makes me smile :-)]. I'm another sentence.  I'm a sentence (and it makes me smile :-) ). I'm another sentence.
exactly. compared to people who don't actually care about music, music lovers are more likely to actually buy the crap.  and download it.
I have been scarred. That just proves that christians are weird as weird can be.
the actual page for the actual camera and the scientist  http://www.ee.ucla.edu/~goda/
*Today, the older son is still in custody in one of those Mormon-run teen penalty camps in Utah,*  Which one? There are a whole bunch of them and a wide, expansive sea of evil shit goes on in those places. If your son's in one of them he could be in very real danger. 
I have been to many a gun show. ANd the only thing odd I saw... was one guy's display case had some KKK business cards attached to them. He was a very old dude. And yes, there are some conspiracy theory books being sold there. But most people at gun shows are ratonal, normal people.
So very odd to hear British accents in porn. 
That analogy only works if software developers had to rewrite the game every time they sold it. Or if all the gardener had to do was push a button to make your lawn look fancy.
The way it is described on Wikipedia is:  &gt; A generic prediction of cosmic inflation is an infinite ergodic universe, which, being infinite, must contain Hubble volumes realizing all initial conditions.  Conclusions come from the postulation that it is infinite rather than the other way around.
Sounds like good preparation for producing champion hockey players.
I prefer Beethoven Symphony No. 6  (Pastoral symphony)
There aren't two options; there are thousands. Sure would suck to spend my whole life believing in the Christian God, following all his weird rules, only to go to hell anyway because the Muslims had it right all along. Or the Zoroastrians. Or the Calvinist Christians, with their much narrower definition of who gets into heaven (something like 144,000 peopleever).  Plus, yeah, it would hurt me. I'd have to give up both of my loves. Fuck that.
so you're saying he can never win. if he wins the fight, he gets in trouble. if he doesn't fight, the other douche gets to pick on him and shove him around and get away with it. 
My best friend has 4 fingers and a thumb and only occasionally turns me down.
You're making an error of the scope of your argument.  The big bang explains the beginning of the universe and so is not *In* the universe.  The cause of the universe (or the big bang) is necessarily before the universe (or the big bang). And does not necessarily act the same way.  The Big Bang theory states that it is the point in which all dimensions came into existence, the start of both space and time. Then, the question "What was there before the Universe?" makes no sense; the concept of "before" becomes meaningless when considering a situation without time, and thus the concepts of cause and effect no longer apply.
*The more you know*
This is entirely awesome... I *seriously* think when it gets to be about halfway through 2010, you need to see how reddit can help.
The media love this kind of story for two reasons.   First, it can be made to be scary enough to draw the morons to their news outlets  Second, it's a story that's easy to put together and doesn't require any thought from the reportertards.
Or maybe the price of oil went down because the Bushbarians finally rode out of town....taking their yee-haw policies with them.   Well...some of them did. OK....at least one did.
You mean that one time you hadron over and he lepton top of you?
Right, I realise the control mechanism isn't active when it doesn't need to be, but my question is, why would people *with* that mechanism have a better chance of passing on their genes than people *without* it?  I just don't see how such a mechanism could get into the gene pool, or have any advance.  Even if its beneficial to the group survival, only the people *without* the mechanism would pass on their genes, so the next time their was overpopulation, the gene should be weeded out.
Yes, congratulations, you have discovered that no solution is perfect, and there are ways to get around it, therefore we should never try.  I hope you don't lock your door, because I can just kick it in. 
"This is kind of like saying in the face of a crime wave,"We shouldn't prosecute gangsters as it would require bringing gang leaders to trial, which would rip our city/town apart". It's a fraudulent, dishonest argument made by a fraudulent, dishonest man."
True, but they hand black belts out like hot dogs at the football. It also depends what Martial Art he had a black belt in as to how he is able to respond.
_Study loses wallet_
&gt; Growing marijuana outside has a major drawback - wild hemp growing will fertilize a nice strain and make into what is lovingly called "mids." Your danks become schwag.  They grow some very fine pot outside here in BC. But carefully monitoring plants and just letting seeds grow will produce different results, of course.
This release didn't come with any stickers!
I thot NSMB lacked quality level designs.  In SMB3 and Mario World I felt something novel in most of the worlds but in NSMB I only enjoyed world 7 like that.
Glad you noticed the irony.  Why does everyone go and blame me every time there's a superflu?
Ism?  Like [McCarthyIsm](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/McCarthyism)?
I've talked to him many times. I remain calm and very polite but he has a little man complex. He feels like he must be the Alpha Male and he ALWAYS thinks he is right no matter what. Logic need not apply to him. I kind of feel sorry for him because he is divorced and spends most of his times watching TV shows.  2 more years and I can finally move out and hopefully get into the college of my choice.
Maybe it's reverse psychology. I read about a couple who named their boys Winner and Loser.  Loser had a successful life and ended up as a cop.  Winner ended up as a drug addict who'd been in and out of prison or something like that. I'm betting this guy is hella cool. edit (source): http://www.smh.com.au/articles/2002/07/31/1027926917671.html  So I was a little off, but pretty close.
Those're flippy-floppies, sir.
I like to think of it as the eternal loop noise, since Windows often doesn't shut down properly on laptops.
Alex had made his mind up that the virus was manufactured two days into the thing...the cdc is now saying that it doesn't have any avian or human components...it's two strains of swine flu. I'm from Texas.(full disclosure, i don't live there now) i don't trust authority...there is inequality and fraud that is systemically rampant in parts of society...but listen to me...please, please listen. Alex Jones is a shuck and jive man. a hustler. a cheap suit tent preacher (ask someone from the south what that means) a salesman. buy a water filter or some gold coins...or those snake oil detox "teas"...buy some dehydrated food...that's all he does...he serves as a bug zapper for paranoids to tune into and BE MARKETED TO. jesus christ grow up.
Uh, give one, just *one* example of the government suppressing any information about this virus. I realize that you are probably just joking around.  But, I get really tired of all this fucking stupid conspiracy crap showing up in every discussion.  Try not to be so stupid.
Just pointing out, I never made such a claim. I agree with you.
I don't call this question really "personal."  Personally, I think it's a valid question, and it's asking a specific group of people.
Each of those folks also has ten toes.  I've seen some dumb fucking crypt-racism on here, but this takes the cake.
From what i have observed most of them are 14-18 year old camwhores who desperately want to be in on the new thing.
it is fantastic, although it often comes with a side of snarky barista
I'm with you.  There have been some flops but I still find it great.  What gets me is every time I say I like Family Guy someone HAS to say "South Park is better!".
I tried being vegetarian about a month ago.  However, I ate meat regularly, so trying to go veggie cold-turkey was probably not the best idea.  The biggest problem I found was that I wasn't getting nearly enough calories; even if I stuffed myself at all three meals (healthy food, cooked at home (generally)), I would still end up feeling hungry most of the day.  It depends on your body, I guess.  I do long-distance road bicycling so if you're really active make sure you're getting enough protein and fats and fuel in general.
No. I'm saying it's not theft.
I wish i got the ifc here.
&gt; Have you ever noticed how the mentality of people like Stan, Kyle, and Cartman switch completely around from episode to episode?  Stan and Kyle, maybe, but Cartman?  Definitely not.  He has a personality all his own, a whiny, selfish, manipulating prick with a fierce exterior and delusional perception of himself to protect himself from his incredibly fragile ego. Stan and Kyle have distinct personalities anyway.  Stan is more playful, Kyle is prudent and preachy.  But they are similar, which is why they get along so well.  Cartman voiced the opinions of Matt and Trey in the Cartoon Wars episode, but so what?  It wasn't at all out of character.  He spent the entire episode manipulating Kyle to get what he wanted, by any means necessary.  &gt; Stan, and Kyle act like children, but any other time they have the mentality of weathered adults.  The flip between childish behavior and acting like adults is a longstanding cartoon convention that started with Charles Schulz and I can't fault them for that.  I don't remember the ep you're talking about with the Priest as the voice of reason, but for the most part all of the adults on that show serve as archetypes rather than fully fleshed out personalities.  There's never been an episode focusing on the Priest's personality and character development, nor should there be.  It would be like focusing an entire episode of the Simpsons on Chief Wiggum, that's not who the focus is.  The children, Stan, Kyle, Cartman, Kenny, Wendy, Butters, Jimmy, even Timmy, have pretty well-defined and consistent personalities, and, as Cartman pointed out, the humor on that show is story and character driven, not necessitating the endless asides and frustrating randomness of Family Guy.  I cheered for Cartman's speech because he was entirely right, I don't understand the appeal of that show, everything about it strikes me as lazy and superficial.
I'm too fucking lazy.  So before you get all high and mighty on me why don't you throw out a fucking example. Also, I never said atrocities never occurred, I just said I couldn't think of the last time I heard of something fucked up.  But I can think of several fucked up things Christians have done in the past month (thanks to reddit lol).
And yet...
Fire protection +2
POOPYFACE.
I guess the RIAA won't be too happy that 3 of their best consumers were killed by our government
psst... the son is YOU.
Yah. Resubmit on the Atheist subreddit, and you'll meet someone special. You're certainly not alone, but wondering with you how many Arab atheists there might be.
&gt; I don't know a single Christian who burns books.  I just wanted to remind you of the fact that you don't know and have never met every single christian.  Soon after reading that you should suddenly realize that you have failed to use sound reason in your logic.  If this surprises or angers your ego, you may considering the dark ages for further bathroom reading (where you likely do your best thinking).
Gee, I'm sorry. I didn't realize that wordpress was not a blog-publishing application.  ....oh, wait....never mind.
Have you read Lewis Thomas too?
I mostly agree, and I guess I'm not the most qualified to talk about it as I no longer have cable and haven't seen the AS lineup for about 3 years...but when I last watched it religiously the sunday night lineup was pretty spectacular. I think it was Squidbillies, Moral Oral, The Brak Show, Space Ghost Coast to Coast, Home Movies, Sealab 2021, Harvey Birdman, ATHF, Futurama, Metalocalypse...and a couple of others.  Anyway, I remember it being the most epically hilarious block of television ever.  I think it's the only time I can say that I actually *looked forward* to sunday nights.
What sane man wouldn't want her?
Its a good thing the government in this country is pro-labor and rejected NAFTA back in the early 90s.
Have you tried our Bacon-ey Breakfast Burritos?
in for later  edit: the ending was magical 
interpol isn't concerned with what he's doing. in most countries what he is doing is a civil matter not a criminal matter, and technically it isn't illegal.
No one gives a shit what happens to christians in the middle east. People only care when an israeli looks at an arab the wrong way or something similar. 
Try to achieve the greatest efficiency at each iteration of software production.
The concept of zero sum trade requires 2 people with identical preferences exchanging equal amounts of the same thing.  Value is subjective, therefore the act of exchanging items can(and does) create value.  Eg, you pay for the internet because you value the internet service more then the cost.  and shitty time warner wants your money more than all that internet.
&gt; ...most of them Union soldiers who had just been released from prison camps such as Andersonville... weak and emaciated...  I believe most of them had had some weeks to recover between their liberation and being shipped North on the Sultana.  But I can't dig up my Sultana books right now to verify that.
&gt; PostgreSQL and MySQL are 100% free  PostgreSQL is completely free. MySQL? [Not so much.](http://www.mysql.com/about/legal/licensing/oem/)
Sincerely?  WTF?
Nah, that's spring, when the alders and birches are spreading their pollen around..
I like both. I'm in trouble.
What the fuck is an arse?
Paris Hilton: "That's hot!"  Nicole Richie: "Yeah... that's hot!"
I'll let Wesley Willis answer that question:   Rock and roll McDonalds,  Rock and roll McDonalds,  Rock and roll McDonalds,  Rock and roll McDonalds   McDonalds will make you fat  They serve Big Macs  They serve Quarter Pounders  They will put pounds on you  I hope you aren't the Engrish teecher! Hilarious kids. The things they say! You should tell them that there are other, *even more fun* ways of getting herpes.   Rock on London!  Rock over Chicago!  McDonalds will make you fat!
No, it's a rotary engine. That's one of the cooler things about the rotary is that it is adaptable to different fuel types, with very little modification.
What the fuck are you talking about.
If I say "that stupid, ugly man walked into my store." I am equating stupid and ugly? I thought I was merely listing descriptors of the man.  EDIT: The comma implies you are listing adjectives of equal weight, not that the adjectives are the same thing.
+1
I am in the vicinity of idiots?
&gt;We all got suspended because "it takes 2 to fight" supposedly.  What... the... fuck?
There should be a TV show about you going around interacting with Christians. 
You people need more active stimulation. Try activities as opposed to those passive things which you've been doing. Go to the gym together and challenge each other on the treadmill. Sign up for dance classes or for rock climbing or go to the swimming pool (don't just lay out on a beach though). Instead of going to a restaurant cook together. And for real, not from a box. Go hitchhiking or camping. Be more active and challenge yourselves. You're both stuck in a boring, boring rut. The more you two put yourselves in situations out of your comfort zone the more you will bond together.
i dont think that makes any sense
I've been running Crunchbang on my Asus 1000HE and it's great.
Interesting. When I saw the headline I thought it was about Susan Boyle.
Even without the overt religious/class discrimination involved in a move like this, I was struck by how ridiculous the "they can sell them" argument is. If you're breeding animals, even to butcher and sell, you butcher at a steady rate to have a sustainable business model. If you kill all the pigs, you get one generation of profit and then you're shit out of luck. I wonder what other countries will use swine flu hysteria to fuck their lower classes.
I don't handle it, I accept the situation, I do what is best for our users and I make time to squeeze in some improvements now and then. When you start hating the beast, that's when things start to really suck.
Thanks. Here is a related [article](http://www.guardian.co.uk/uk/2005/nov/12/secondworldwar.world) The situation today is different and must be pursued, I believe.
This site has the standard real-time map plus another map that shows how the flu is clustered... hard to explain but it's alot easier to read. It also has some news and basic tips on staying healthy.  www.swineflutrackingmap.com
[TERRORIST BREAKFAST!](http://www.theage.com.au/ffximage/2008/04/23/obama1_wideweb__470x326,2.jpg "Presidential Om nom nom nom")
&gt;Then: a good funny show.  Now: tanking like most shows that runs for so many seasons FTFY p.s. i stopped watching family guy like a year ago when the hell did stewie become gay?
Following the Constitution and allowing adults to do with their bodies what they see fit? Well I never...
They added like 20 seconds to the clock before the page loaded. No way would I spend half a minute on that bullshit.
&gt;Spanish flu is estimated to have killed 50M worldwide (estimates vary from 20M-100M) when the world's population was &lt;2B. A flu with the same mortality rate would kill 150M+.  &gt;Countries go to war over a few thousand people.  ...you are right, i must have reading problems, I thought you were insinuating the swine flu might kill 150 million people
How many cat skeletons has he found in trees?
You forget..  Even snake oil works a little if you believe it will.. Its called a placebo.  If you believe "a lot".. then you can convince yourself of pretty much anything.
Thank god I live in Mexico
I just need a good text editor, vim fulfills that role as perfectly as is possible. 
Speaking for myself I use tables only when displaying data (like a spec sheet for products i.e. length, width, color).   The only other reason to use tables is trying to get a site to display in IE6 (*insert cursing and swearing here*) because CSS support is virtually non-existent.  People aren't against using tables. They are against using tables improperly. 
Okay, yeah, I guess I didn't really say that explicitly, but I did intend to implicitly agree with it.
Reality was in fact so simple that I completely lost track of it before actually posting an explanation.
Taking a Cold War class right now, the books required are very thorough and informative  A Hard and Bitter Peace: A Global History of the Cold War by Edward H. Judge and John W. Langdon (This is my personal favorite)  Strategies of Containment: A Critical Appraisal of Postwar American National Secuirty by John Lewis Gaddis. (Domestic policy, war strategy, etc.)  The Global Cold War: Third World Interventions by Odd Arne Westad. (Foreign policy, stuff like Vietnam, Angolan Civil War, etc.)  and you always need a document book, I used The Cold War: A History in Documents and Eyewitness Accounts by Jussi M. Hanhimki and Odd Arne Westad. Stuff from Truman Doctrine to Geneva, Stalin's speeches etc. 
Me too. I'm sick of the Steampunk backlash. In fact, I'm pretty sick of backlashes in general. Something gets popular and everyone likes it, then at some point in time it becomes popular for everyone to dislike it because of how popular it's become.   Steampunk was/is certainly overplayed, but that doesn't mean it's all bad. Tell me this [Steampunk Vader](http://www.likecool.com/Gear/Pic/Steampunk%20Star%20Wars%20Lord%20Vader/Steampunk-Star-Wars-Lord-Vader.jpg) isn't badass.
Virginia Foxx: first elected in 2004.  Two two-year terms and someone calls for term limits?
Very true, all those are positions are just a popularity contest in the communities. It is just like every other political position. 
Am I the only person who is appalled by how much time is being wasted debating what to call it?  Isn't there anything more important to talk about?
Because her tits might spring a leak.
&gt;Life is not just about enjoying yourself unless you've developed some crazy nihilistic outlook.  Yeah but its still a big part of it. There arent more than a few things I'd put above it.
In times like these, I like to close my eyes, hum a happy tune, and pretend that Episodes I-III do not exist.  EDIT: I must be delusional. Thanks, AlphaSquad7!
I changed my mind, now I want to see Hannity do **that** for charity. 
Yes, FBI?  You know that terrorist you've been looking for?
...as in "Blame The Producer".
It's gotta be said - 2.7M trees is not that much.   This organization http://www.jamkhed.org/Environment.shtml that has a budget of under a million dollars a year - which predominantly goes toward training community health workers and running a hospital, not anything environmental - has managed to plant 5 million trees.
People are going crazy about this, Its pretty stupid.
Whatever happened to that bitch?  I remember I was watching Fox News, yeah I know I know, when she said that, and I was like "WTF?".  Then later that day and week all hell broke loose about that.  The next thing I know a week later her contract is not renewed.
You recalled wrong. Franken hasn't been seated yet.   &gt;If only it had stayed at 59, you could have gone through the next 4 years and blamed every Obama shortcoming on the Republicans.  We still can blame the Republicans for driving this country into a ditch. It's going to take more than 100 days to unfuck the country after GOP rule, but it will happen much faster once Franken is seated.  What cracks me up is the conservatives who refuse to recognize how bad of shape the Republicans left this country, or how much work is required to get us back on track. Well, the American people have given the steering wheel back to the adults, so we would just appreciate if you children would just sit quietly while we fix your mess. 
Imaginary
This is kind of like saying in the face of a crime wave,"We shouldn't prosecute gangsters as it would require bringing gang leaders to trial, which would rip our city/town apart". It's a fraudulent, dishonest argument made by a fraudulent, dishonest man.
I can't remember, but I would assume The Demon Haunted World has a bibliography, so we could probably find out what Sagan was looking at with regards to Hypatia. Could be interesting.
Toxic Shock Syndrome, and it can be fatal so I don't think you'd experience more than maybe twice.
I think the "regression" actually refers to logical precedence.  The turtle underneath turtle X is logically required for X to stand on, but it too needs a turtle so we must go "back" to a precondition for that turtle too, etc. When applied to a temporal series the direction of the regress is clear, since causality works forwards in time.
I will also award +2 courage. You could have wasted alcohol. 
Ok, you don't have to agree with the vaccination theory if you don't like it, fine.  But basically vaccines are MEANT to introduce a weaker version, and/or an incomplete version, and/or a debilitated version of that which they are fighting.  Why?  In order to arouse and to prime our own immune system against those agents.  In other words, if you don't like vaccine theory, you had so many years, decades really, to be angry about it.  Don't start now!  But if you have been quiet all these decades about vaccinations, then don't be a moron and start just now with this particular vaccine!  Why not pick on any other vaccine?  They all work on the same principle.  Maybe genetically engineering things to put into vaccines is not the best idea...fine.  But at least have some goddamn respect for the established vaccination theory!  Don't make it sound like some crazy conspiracy by the new world order.
"Hate Crime".  Hating someone is a crime.  Think about that.
show rick james your titties.  The brunette in that episode was hot as hell.
Waters will rise and flood major cities on the coast, which is a TON of land and people.  The rise in temperature will cause the reduction of food-producing lands, as well as a disruption in species.  It could possibly cause too much rain to fall, killing crops and spreading famine around the world.  Third world countries would not be able to handle this, causing massive starvation, riots, and eventually wars that will pull the US in and/or spread there.  This isn't even mentioning the necessity of the US needing to relocate all of the displaced people because of rising waters within its own borders.  And that's just the start of the problem.
I agree very much, but I think a free-market, small government implementation would create scores of both.
It wont, they let him win so now they have to run with it.
He sure does have a large stick. That's how i was formed.
what? put faith in a politician to "do the right thing"? pffft. fucking naive people.
Let's postulate that the Multiverse is less than infinite, but really large and we luckily found our universe in this really large, but not infinite sample. Why stop at really large if we bring luck into it then?  Just make it *really* lucky and the number of universes in the Multiverse is one.
Do you really think any of those things are "good" for America? I think it really sad if you do.
Would sticking out my tongue foil this? Or forcing a smile?
Some interesting comparisons of MLM to CEOs
Damn.... Teabow was already getting into more panties than you, now theres no way you'll catch up
fake tits?
First off, I'm disappointed by the abusive comments so far posted here. I know Reddit can do better.   National Geographic has an [excellent article](http://ngm.nationalgeographic.com/2009/02/north-korea/oneill-text) on the plight of those who escape from North Korea. I didn't notice it in the online version, but the hard copy I have shows a map of the journey many of these people make. They escape to China, travel by train until they reach Burma, trek through the country until they get to Thailand, and from there they will go to the officials in Bangkok, and hope they are deported to South Korea. It's amazing what they must go through, the thousands of miles they must travel, all the risks they must take, to reach a place that is only 30 miles where they started from. And, of course, only the extremely lucky ever make it. Many become slaves, many end up in prisons, many are taken back to North Korea, many are never heard from again. 
The shills are out today.  Don't try to trick me to use your dodgy os, I am not moving to Vista and not to W7.
Of course, but when that sort of energy and outrage is directed towards a children's novel that's been made into a movie, it seems like wasted anger in a world with real problems.
This isnt about two people alone in a gym.  + The event happened during gym class.  + There were probably 20 or 30 other kids there who witnessed the event.  + Those witnesses told their stories to their friends.  + The school rallied and 400 students led a protest, so I would think that what these students learned from their friends was pretty compelling.
i have no idea what that means but i get the feeling it was not your original intention. so you go ahead and tell yourself whatever you need to, just don't expect me to buy it.
Cantor? I thought we told you to get out of here with your god damned diagonalization argument!
Ooh, blatant, heavy-handed propaganda you say? Sign me up!
To each his own. Enjoying oneself can also be accomplished by being a little bit selfless.
I found this on imminst.org (The Immmortality Insitute's forum),and after reading this, I knew it had to be submitted.  This is an excellent read and describes the extent and methodology of conditioning in America. I hold many similar views with the author and have have spent the last few years trying to remove as many layers of this conditioning as possible.  Meditation and other "spiritual practices" do help but they are disconnecting you from the mainstream.  This is quite the conundrum because operating consciousness within this hologram is sometimes the only way to put the proverbial bread on the table in the United States.
Couldn't agree more. I was just trying to fend off what I thought was the inevitable tide of people telling me what a huge idiot I was.  I do believe in the scientific method and reductionism, but I believe in other things too.
If it were, wealth could not have been been created, i.e. no capital goods, or consumer goods could have been made.  In other words, no mines, no machines, no transportation, no electronics, no computers, no keyboards, and no ridiculous questions asked on social sites like Reddit...
I get it, but I wonder how many of these whipper-snappers on reddit will.
Recently ive bought from this new dealer and his bags are always super potent like a surprise when i smell it and it feels as if the bags kind of wet or dampish. Ive never had this happen before and ive heard of people wetting it down to make it weigh more to rip you off but, other than that its good weed, dunno if its something to be suspicious of? anyone know what im talking about??
It's not confined to men in their 20's.  Though the game changes in their 40's. Round of golf anyone?
Nope - never got to him.
Those obese people are dying several, perhaps as much as 10, years before they would otherwise die from something else.  Swine flu is striking down people with 60-80 years left to them.   And it's communicable. And *really* bad for asthmatic geeks (like me) that you'll find on reddit in high concentrations.
Try killing a tv while bathing next time.  It could work wonders for your personality.
I'll second the motion...
Don't worry; I loved the sour cream.
"New (horrible money making opportunity) to ruin an otherwise perfectly good original movie."
Conversions are typically associated with the beginnings of personal change. Personal change should be what is relevant, not the in-name conversion.  Many people convert from being nominally Christian to actively trying to follow Jesus. I would guess that's what most prison conversions are.
Yeah, you and the rest of the world. Do you feel special?
Booze: makes another pussy pass out.
Writing drivers for printers where I've had to reverse engineer the protocol because the vendor documentation is either wrong, incomplete, or outright lying.
I think in perl, but dream in lisp
Is speed/memory a huge priority?  This is evil in its own way, but, you may be able to build your code on the side, instead of directly coupled with what is there.  If there is something sort of like a model, but too shitty to use without pain, it might be easier to write your own that can be somewhat extended instead of tying into the crap that is already there.
Are you telling me you wouldn't be interested in an 1850s England MMORPG where you're a dandy who runs around in a top hat beating up street urchins and wealthy financiers before riding away on your bicycle with a massive front wheel? A game where your quests are to "Report to the Queen - Enslave Foreigners", or "Beat up the French".  When your stats get low you have to eat kidney pie before you catch the rickets! Just Imagine!
&gt;Except on a moral level, it's wrong. You are using this software without the maker's consent. If you don't have the money for it, tough luck. It's a game, not food or shelter. It's not your right to have it. Using something someone else made without his permission is morally wrong.  Except arguing that something should be some way because you feel it's morally right isn't how things work.  &gt;That does hurt the dev.  Often it directly hurts the publisher more than the developers.  In any case, I'm not saying that piracy is economically sound. I'm saying it isn't stealing.
It's the stupid "Zero Tolerance" policy that some over conservative council member brought in for Ontario schools. It usually just causes more harm than good because it follows rules, not reason in deciding a punishment.
If there's a neighbor with a wifi network, you might be able to get the password with a nice "please".   Follow it up with a nice six-pack or bottle of wine and you will have a new friend.  It worked for us.
It's orange.
Chrome: "Malware Detected!"
There are no signs of life in Madagascar.  I DID IT ZOMG. Finally.
Well, many of the ten planks involve seizing control of something.  The methods of seizing control would naturally be a standing army or a secret police or both, both naturally tending to a dictatorship.  This is not to say that some things should not be controlled by the state.  Roads and rail are a good example of what should be owned by the state (notice I said rail, not the rail cars).  Natural monopolies should be owned by the state, but not education, food (or any other kind of) production, or god forbid medicine.  Strangely, my theories indicate that private police forces would be better than public ones.
I'd call it orange, but I'd go with #C63 personally.
&gt;How can the world be richer, if we blow those raw materials up.  It isn't about the world being richer, it's about the US being richer.  Working factories have a competitive advantage when other factories have been bombed. Most of the developed world was noticeably poorer after WWII.  The US exported a lot of energy-intensive and manufactured goods. Another effect that should be conidered is the way war takes people who had been moderately self-sufficient (i.e., farm children) and gets them used to being disconnected from production.  This may mean a decline in real wealth, but it would put a dollar value on things that had been free, which economists seem to like.  Restaurants and brothels are better for the GDP than marriages...
I took the headline from the article...
There was never a conceptual implementation, only legacy.  Yeah it sucks but because it is an *ancient* establishment it's very difficult to see how it could possibly go away..
With scabs? Nope.
You are a king among men... and apes.
he was and then he found jesus in a small mexican prison who raped him every night for 5 years.  of course i just made this up but hey what makes what im saying any different from what religion preaches?
Better than paying for cable bitch.
Ah, that's disappointing.  I've been thinking about getting one and have wondered if anyone (other than my family who's also on Reddit) would recognize it.  Maybe it's just that no one said anything?  I'll have boobs under my t-shirt, so maybe that would prompt more comments.
No, it means that it boots faster. It means that it is better at booting. 
 $ ls -l /bin/ls  -rwxr-xr-x 1 root root 110248 2009-04-07 20:12 /bin/ls  $ LC_TIME=C ls -l /bin/ls  -rwxr-xr-x 1 root root 110248 Apr  7 20:12 /bin/ls  $ LC_ALL=C ls -l /bin/ls  -rwxr-xr-x 1 root root 110248 Apr  7 20:12 /bin/ls  However, I'm not sure why you'd want to lose the year in the date format.
Leela needs to be a genetic cyclops, but other than that it's great. Not a huge fan of the Professor (too Master Roshi-ish for my taste) but the revisions on Bender is *awesome*. 
Depending on the site, I do or dont put forms into tables. It depends on the look and feel I am asked for. You can always make it work with css, but sometimes that comes down to creating css for that specific form. If I have a site with over 100 forms in it, rendering to to a table makes for an awful lot less work than tweaking a css version for 100 forms. Other than that, never use tables, except for tabular data.
Too much force I'd assume.
Why do you think you are entitled to pollute the environment?  Don't politicize this.
To bad nothing will come of this!
system development life cycle cis ftw    
129  * 8GB flash drive * 120GB Zune * ~1GB phone
So the president issuing an executive order allows him or anyone he designates the ability to do what would otherwise be a criminal offense without danger of prosecution? How do you think it would have gone over if Clinton had issued an executive order allowing oral sex in the oval office and lying about it? Do you think the GOP would say, "Oh, well, if he issued an executive order then it's perfectly fine."? If Obama issued an executive order declaring the US to be a Socialistic state (yeah, I know he isn't a socialist and that they're full of it, but go with me on this) the Republican Party would happily go along with that and support it? Why is it only Republican Presidents and their cabinet secretaries who think declaring what they do as not illegal makes it not illegal?
I think she needs me...
They don't necessarily become equated or follow from one another, and in that I agree with you to some extent.  However, language has some subtlety to it.  Intuition.  Feeling.  I could tell, and don't ask me how, what the original poster meant to say.  And I acted on it.  If you read what the original poster have said back to me, you'll see this for yourself.  I could feel that he was trying to build an association between size and voluptuousness.  In your example, it's a little bit implying that stupidity is ugly.  Not much!  But it does feel that way a little bit.  It's a subtle shade.
Rhetoric aside, I agree that the Democrats should just disregard the Republicans completely and just start forcing their agenda. 
Sorry, I guess I'm confusing it with multi-worlds in quantum theory. But as pointed out elsewhere infinity!=infinite regression.
It's your irony detector. He's supposed to be the same spirit reincarnated a bunch of times, right?
I think it refers to Obamanoids like yourself.
Yeah, the Church used torture for hundreds of years, to make 'sincere' converts, and punish those who didn't 'convert'! No wonder they like it?
Hahahahahahah!  "Oh no, look out guys! Roll your sleeves down! It's Purple Aki!"
Well, since I already know what is going on during the underlying operations, why should it matter if I shield myself from the mundane?  Also, if you care to see what is happening during the underlying operations, it exposes those to you quite effectively if you ask it to.
Stopped reading at "prestigious college in Azerbaijan."
It was witchcraft like this that destroyed smallpox! How dare they!
You know, I have been following the development of this game for a year or so. It actually looks sort of compelling to me, but the fact that I have to buy a useless ill-engineered hunk of plastic in order to play it sort of turns me off to the concept.
I've got to admit, I fell for the whole Y2K bug.  But i was like 10, so I guess I had an excuse.
Need a counterweight for my car - 29 (Statesville)  Date: 2009-04-30,  7:37PM EDT   After getting the new car, I've decided that it would handle better with a counterweight. The ideal counterweight would be between 90 and 120 lbs, with a small to medium sized chest.  This is purely for center of gravity issues, you understand.  As a counterweight, you'll be responsible for occupying the car on road trips, brief jaunts around town, or other driving situations that require enhanced performance from a more balanced suspension.  The ideal counter-weight will also be aesthetically pleasing, as we can't really accent a Lotus with a sub-standard counterweight. In exchange for your services distributing an even weight load in the vehicle, you will receive free transportation and meals as necessary.  Shiny baubles may also be provided, on the condition that they enhance the appearance of the car when viewed from the outside. Hair must be maintainable in such a way that it's not going to blow around violently with the top down.  Shave it, braid it, or bow-tie it....it's up to you.  Aesthetics again, you understand. If you think you have what it takes, write me and we can arrange a performance evaluation in the vehicle.  Location: Statesville it's NOT ok to contact this poster with services or other commercial interests  http://images.craigslist.org/3nf3md3p6ZZZZZZZZZ94u6d1973e320841c59.jpg http://images.craigslist.org/3nd3o33l4ZZZZZZZZZ94u8f30757b3ccf1c4a.jpg
[Here](http://www.geocities.com/corewin2/download.html)
nuh uh.
ok. That was creepy.
If you hear talking aspirin when you get a headache, you might want to consider something other than over-the-counter medication.
The thing is that big banks owns all of the above. 
Nice! Especially how the thumbnail has suggestion of boob, meaning I clicked it before reading the comments here. 
Touche.
The way you've phrased your example about vegetarians, it could be a legitimate point of debate.  To invoke the fallacy, you need to start with a statement and then shift when confronted with an incongruous case to attempt to maintain the original statement.  So here's the fallacy with an adjusted version of your example: A: No vegetarians eat fish! B: But that man eats fish, and people call him a vegetarian. A: He's not a real vegetarian.  Scotsman is perhaps a clearer example than vegetarian since it is harder to argue about the definition of Scotsman (a man born and raised in Scotland is a fair presumption) than it is the social convention of what qualifies as vegetarian, which may lack a real consensus.  I suppose you'd have to take a poll to find out.  For our purposes, I would argue that a Lutheran (or a Buddhist) is a Lutheran (or a Buddhist) if a majority of Lutherans (or most Buddhists) regard him or her as a Lutheran. (or a Buddhist)  In other words, the standard to which the label applies is a societal one.  Based on that standard, I think you are probably stuck defending reincarnation if you wish to call what you're defending 'Buddhism', and I don't think it's any more defensible than a belief in the existence of Zeus is.  If you want to lay out your own beliefs that are quite different you're welcome to, but Buddhism they are not likely to be.  On to why Science and Buddhism are not the same thing.  String theory and Buddhism are both lengthy endeavors composed largely of work by individuals respected in the field, yes, you are correct.  From there material differences diverge, however.  For a proposition in String Theory to be accepted as even a possibility, it must present a mathematical model that is provably consistent with what we have already observed to be true about the universe on the macro and subatomic scale.  There is no such check on Buddhism, and ideas aren't even required to make logical sense, since they can be waived as trancendental or beyond living understanding or beyond the ability of language to communicate, which are all very helpful tools for defending un-disprovable false statements.  After that first step check on String Theory, there is established only the possibility that an idea might be true.  For it to be science, it needs to make predictions which may then be verified by experiment.  If the experiment produces different results, then decades of work can be thrown out in seconds.  Buddhism, I daresay, has no such process of possible falsification, which is why it is a closed theory, and the scientific process (and String Theory) are not. (Closed theories are assertion sets that may be used to interpret any possible event while preserving their existence, and are therefore impossible to falsify.  Examples include God, Marxism, and the Tooth Fairy, all of which cannot be absolutely disproved, but may well be untrue anyway.)
I hope someone did.
my roomate said artest too, but my first reaction was...is artest ghetto....or just fucking crazy.
In Canada, Marijuana was effectively decriminalized for a few years because the laws did not have proper exemptions for medicinal use. Unfortunately, this ruling was later overturned and it remains illegal (though not extremely well enforced).
That movie sucked balls that were crammed up a dogs ass.
It's not like there's much to say about him after all.  He inadvertently mandged to atract the most vile people on the internet to his website where they proceded to reap havock.
I was a child, it should be made to withstand that.
Impressive :)
Outside of the large Canadian towns it is still 99% white and racism is still quite rampant within all aspects of the smaller towns.
*rimshot*
"Fewer" cars.  
Family Guy has never been better.
somebody kick this lady in the face. im sick and tired of letting them go on about how everyone who isn't christian is evil and going to "hell" or hades or whatever made up afterlife place they are spitting out of their stupid mouths this century.
Pigluenza.
Because they ain't got better shit to do? I guess these people must think they are holy and 100% heaven-safe.   AFAIK, you shouldn't care WTF other people are doing, what matters is what YOU do and know.  It's these people that give God and the bible a bad name.
... yeah, cheap electrics,... where I live, losangeles.craigslist.org/msg is a veritable treasure trove of instruments cheap to ultra-expensive.  The bottom of the barrel electrics are... well... I've seen a guy absolutely shred on a Brownsville Strat copy.  If the action is good and there's no buzzing around the 12th fret it's probably an ok guitar. I'd say it's a good deal with the amp (and a guitar cable?) thrown in.
Maybe they hope the 'stuff' will form a critical mass and blow the moron party up for good?
This reminds me of Trex from dinosaur comics.
Firefox 3 on OS X handled it fine.  Sprint people:  I like the page.  Redditors get the most mileage from whining; don't sweat it.
I'm vegetarian because I liked animals since I was little and didn't want to eat them and still don't. I find meat gross.
You mean financial guns?  Yeah, but the same guns are pointed at anyone and everyone with low income.
Reminds me of "Slutz," the Bratz doll parody, which also features a tramp stamp activity: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eCBcv7YWlAA
Beauty Queen Logic: You can pay a doctor to surgically insert a bag of silicon under your skin to entice men and reap the benefits of sexual exploitation, yet same-sex marriage is wrong.
But the problem with referencing something like evolution is that we don't feel comfortable using that as blanket statement of morality.  If, for example, it could be proven that we've evolved to hate homosexuality, this does not mean most of us would consider it valid to label homosexuality as immoral.  I think the best argument is one from causing unnecessary pain, but if we follow this through to it's logical conclusion we reach certain problems.  If a person just views child pornography, are they immoral?  If a person rapes a person that is unconscious (and would never have any knowledge of the event), are they immoral?  If a person kills another person in their sleep --- a person that no one would ever miss ---  are they immoral? We still want to label actions as immoral regardless of the result.  Where is the justification for such actions other than "I wouldn't want that to happen to me" (which correspondingly has it's own logical inconsistencies. 
Their goal is to reach a google dollars.
yes, if it is difficult to burn, and appears wet..that's what they did. If it's difficult to burn but just feels more "alive, or fresh" it's probably natural moisture. If it's moist at all on the outside, it's bs, this fucker did that to me once. I thought he was selling me an 1/8, it was a "quarter". So yeah, don't get fronted mystery bags by dudes that used to be crips and work in the same restaurant as you.
Because you know when they're down to just their socks, it's time for business.
&gt; So apparently Swine Flu cann turn you into a Zombie  But cann it turn you into James Cann?  EDIT: I kid because I love, I have spelling errors in many of my submissions.
It seems that the true heroes of the film are the scientists and engineers who build all of the incredible stuff that Joe and his friends will no doubt destroy.  I'M FUCKING HIGH.
right on right on!!
Man, that's bound to be one crowded mirror.
She showed up at my place with icecream and the first season of the Golden Girls the minute she found out about Bea Arthur. 
Yep, Morrissey solo also.
Too complex to work, or too big to fail?
Who says that Nader has the best policies?
I'm sorry, but I think your definitions are a bit messed up.  Atheism isn't not believing in a god, thats being nonreligious.  Atheism is the belief that God does not exist.  Agnosticism is essentially the believe that there is not enough evidence one way or another to determine whether or not a god exists.  All my statement said was the science, theism, and any other theory NECESSARILY rely on brute facts.  At some point or another, a theory becomes irreducible.  For example, we can explain lightning down to a point until we reach brute facts, where our theory becomes irreducible.  It is just that God, in the case of the theist or deist, is whats called a high order brute fact.  It's far more complex then a scientists brute fact.  If you don't believe me, please look at some of the brute facts...  Why do objects have mass?  Can you explain this in any other way besides "they just do?"  We must accept this brute fact on faith.  Take an intro philosophy class sometime.
Ah, hell.. you considered it?! For fuck's sake, why did you do that? Hundreds of years of work down the drain. Now we have to make up a whole new set of axioms and start over from scratch...   You should know better &gt;(
Homogay.  Poulet.  Green.
They day I don't believe what I saw on the internet is the day I turn in my badge and gun.
There is only one acceptable call and response.   "Hamburger?"  "Raccoon."  "[Cuil](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/7da5i/police_raids_reveal_baby_farms/c06cqxb)."
That's funny, I didn't think I had subscribed to the Obamanoid sub-reddit.
You can't "choose to believe".  You either believe or you don't.  All you can do is change how you act.  If you want to "act like there is a god", that presumably means that you would follow the teachings of one particular branch of one particular religion.  Seeing as there differences even in the most basic things like the ten commandments, how would you know which teachings to follow?  If you don't know which god might be real, which religion might be right, and which particular branch of that religion is the correct one...  what should you do?
This is a classic case of creating fake "bad guys" to draw people's attention away from what is really going on.  Maybe Diane should re-evaluate the HUGE contributions she gets from the music and movie industries.
That would have made a better title :D
or **Baconnaise**
You play fantasy, you re-live history.
I've heard this interdisciplinary sentiment a lot in my undergraduate careerespecially from students and professionals in the liberal arts disciplines.  I think this is probably very good advice for most of the liberal arts, especially in graduate programs.  However, his restructuring idea is damned near impossible, impractical, or undesirable in the physical sciences.  Perhaps it would make a great deal of sense in graduate and research studies, but it is untenable for undergraduate studies.  Semester after semester, you're learning real and valuable techniques which are predicated upon the prior semester.  For example, in physics the study of optics is based upon your prior knowledge of quantum mechanics, electrodynamics, statistical mechanics, and classical mechanics.  Quantum mechanics is based upon statistical mechanics and classical mechanics.  Statistical mechanics relies on an understanding of classical mechanics.  These four subjects are the foundation of the last two years of an undergraduate degree in physics.  They're predicated upon an understanding of elementary physics in **all** fields.  I know chemistry has a similar undergraduate track.  You're not "working on a problem" or in a specific domain.  You're gaining **literacy** in the field.  You may be able to phrase a valid inquiry before you've gone through this, but you cannot begin to answer it.  So, I agree to some of the sentiments of the author, but I don't think his proposal is a basis for developing a solution.  I especially dislike his notion of making university education more vocational.  At least at my university, students have vast opportunities for vocational or research experiences for pay or credit while receiving their education.  The point of a higher education is to give your work a larger meaning and context.  You may do the same "job" as someone without a degree, but you'll see more and have more opportunities for that broader vision than someone without that experience.  &amp;c;
veryseml will have their door knocked down and will go missing in.. 4.. 3.. 2.. 
The definition of theft **can't** apply on something digital. 
http://imgur.com/2LUq.png
i was born in the la area but raised in sacramento, and spent my late teens and all of my 20's in oakland/berkeley before moving back to la. i do not work in the industry and it has TOTALLY rubbed off on me. my friends say the same thing. i never thought about any of that stuff when i lived in the bay area. i figured i was cute enough and smart enough and i enjoyed my friends, and that was enough for me. but down here it is everywhere. i live in the beach cities and it is just as insane here as anywhere else. it is a real effort to accept myself as i am and not compare myself to those thinner, younger, prettier, better connected and wealthier than i am. 
&gt; When he showed me the "finished" pages they looked good and were cross browser, but did not validate and were full or tables.  If the tables were for displaying tabular data then the designer obviously used them for the right reason.   The fact that you put "finished" in quotes and use phrases like "full of tables" makes you sound like a fucking douchebag project manager who has read some articles and inferred (blindly) that tables are "bad" in markup.  You sound like a nightmare client. The shit you're trying to pull now... you might get away with it if the guy is just starting out.  Established companies will either drop you as a bad debt/toxic client (they can afford it) or shit on you in court (they can afford that too).  Either way, you'll end up paying.  You need to stop being an ass and pay your designer/agency.  *Edit:* It looks to me you posted this "story" as a means to find excuses NOT to pay somebody who has done work for you. Wrong audience, fucko. This subreddit is about web design, not about *your* fucking inability to select and manage contractors properly.  Shore up your ineptitude somewhere else.
I think a big part of it has to do with the exam involved in screening for prostate cancer. There's still a lot of homophobia surrounding that, men don't want to have a finger stuck "there." It makes the issue particularly icky to talk about in public it seems.
I would love to play a MMORPG in a Rome setting.  It would be a unique experience to be involved in a massive battle over realistic and historical terrain.  A nice touch would be an complex government system that the players could advance in rank just like a warrior or crafter, but couldn't really master without sufficient experience in other fields.
Because it could have been a far more serious problem if it wasn't resolved in time. That's not to say that 100% of the flaws were corrected on time, but that the major ones were. In other words, the bomb was not a dud - it was defused.
apparently your parents thought so.
This was after his auntie got scared?
as an extension of that point , I would like to add ,don't skimp on the planning phase a few UML diagrams might take you an hour or two to flesh out but you'll get that time back and more later in the project.
That headline has a lot of room for improvement.
NO its not true, if you fap to anykind of penis its gay. You are gay end of story.
Hmm. If it's dried and cured correctly, it really shouldn't be wet or damp. But then, I often pick up stuff that has clearly not been dried and cured correctly.  But my guess is like you said: he's spraying it down to skimp .5g or something. Does the weed dry out over the span of a week or something?
just gave up...
Idk, if im not mistaken i think they pollinate without the assistance of insects and just by wind, so it may work. Is it not possible just to take a trip to your grow spot once or twice? I would try it in any case, what do you have to lose? 
,
Dear REDDIT - please help me get rid of this spamming asshole.  Please upvote the following links.  http://www.reddit.com/r/reportthespammers/comments/8dgql/spamming_your_two_dress_the_princess_flash_game/ http://www.reddit.com/r/reportthespammers/comments/80frk/xitigirlscom_spam_from_martin112233
Throughout college I have spent a good deal of my free time taking pictures but it was only recently that I decided to put them on display by building a website. Id love to get some feedback on both the site and the photos themselves, if youve got a moment.
Plug and play.
Those zero tolerance policies are simply an excuse to be as stupid as possible. They all punish people for no good reason at all, other than the foolish consistency that is the hobgoblin of little minds.
Big Da Vinci fan, myself.
Romeo Oscar Foxtrot Lima Mike Alpha Oscar.
Evolution is best imagined as transmission mechanism for genes, as opposed to organisms.  Also, it isn't perfect - it's a random universe so sometimes shit just happens.
Downvoted for linking straight to 4chan. It's 404 already
Places where there are no jobs.
Dear REDDIT - please help me get rid of this spamming asshole.  Please upvote the following links.  http://www.reddit.com/r/reportthespammers/comments/8dgql/spamming_your_two_dress_the_princess_flash_game/ http://www.reddit.com/r/reportthespammers/comments/80frk/xitigirlscom_spam_from_martin112233
Yeah, I am not sure what that is all about.
I commend you for making a conscious choice, but for the sake of your health, see a nutritionist, or do some research on protein replacements - particularly for iron. You do need to know what to replace the nutrients that you'll be missing, and some vitamins are a lot more difficult to get from vegetable sources. (Iron, for example, is not as easily absorbed.) 
Yeah cuz now chain stores like urban outfitters are carrying record players, and helping to break down culture a little bit more.
It's graphic because it's real. It's not some movie special effect.
Why did Bart get a negative 1? And how can there be a negative 0? 
WTF, Japan, seriously, why? 
&gt;2nd tier sports FTL  Yeah, besides the U.S., hockey's only popular in loser places like Canada, Eastern Europe, and Scandinavia. Places that don't know about gooder first tier sports like American Football.
I dont think he can walk after that.
See for me its mainly about relaxing. Yeah I play with friends but if I just spent the last 15 hours working on my lab report. Fuck if Im not gonna spend the weekend playing computer games, friends or not. 
We're not overpopulated.  Starvation and other resource issues happening now are due to crappy government and corruption, not supply issues.  Pollution is another matter that has little to do with the topic.
ugh im sick of seeing that Scriptina font!!!  -pulls out hair-
I do believe you are right, late nite sir.
One of his suggestions is standardised packaging. An advantage of this, he thinks, would be that smaller distros can "borrow" packages from larger ones. Unless the smaller distros provide the source as well, that is a GPL violation. If the smaller distros are providing the source already, they may as well just use their own package format.
You understand that the infinite monkey theorem isn't used as a justification for a many-worlds theory, right? This postulation doesn't make much sense. 
Me, too.
I thought dinosaurs did exist.
Don't tell me, every time her nose ran everyone shouted "she's full!"?
What a psychopath.
&gt; Secondly, if this other plane of existence is not subject to causality ( a mighty fine claim by the way )it could never decide (we're talking about a place of minds right?) to do anything....So an infinite regress of thoughts is required to come to a decision, since each thought is preceded by another.  Non sequitur.  Whatever mystical creatures reside in higher planes of existence that the dualist puts forth are capable of anything the dualist decides since there is no objective measure of the other plane of existence.
JKD Concepts would say he didn't do what's right. Ideally you want to annihilate your opponent, and then run like hell, but that gets you into jail even faster :(.
Ive got a hunch it was traumatizing and maybe involved being shot by a BB gun, getting dunked by bullies in the pool, and people reading his diary/stealing his homework.
&gt;The paper WAS properly peer-reviewed  Assigning your own reviewers is not how you do a peer review.  It is the responsibility of the journal to supply independent reviewers that are anonymous to the reader as well as the author.  In this case the author of the paper supplied their own reviewers.   This is not how a peer review is supposed to work.  One would also hope that the _editor_ is, at least, aware of a paper being included in the journal.  
Nothing different that I can think of.  Just would be nice to know. Maybe that knowledge could prove useful?
I think your in the wrong here, even if they "fixed" the issue. Windows 7 is not a stable released operating system, they shouldn't be expected to support it. I can also see legitimate reason for not letting users download the client when using that OS. People using Windows 7 beta could potentially begin demanding support for an operating system that won't be out for another 6 months.
How do you think it would have gone over if Clinton had issued an executive order allowing oral sex in the oval office and lying about it? Do you think the GOP would say, "Oh, well, if he issued an executive order then it's perfectly fine."? If Obama issued an executive order declaring the US to be a Socialistic state (yeah, I know he isn't a socialist and that they're full of it, but go with me on this) the Republican Party would happily go along with that and support it? Why is it only Republican Presidents and their cabinet secretaries who think declaring that when they do something it's not illegal makes it not illegal?
If someone only preys upon you it is not that helpful. Full full effect only the sacrifice of a goat will do.
Yes. An honest heart does not attempt deceit, and all intentions are visible to an omnipotent God. 
&gt; from an epistemological sense, if you have no way of sensing something, that thing does not exist  First: epistemology is not about what exists. Metaphysics is about what exists, and confusing the two will make for bad philosophy.   Second: no, not even from the point of view of epistemology is it true that it doesn't "exist." I'm not aware of *any* contemporary epistemologists who would agree with the extremely naive and dogmatic empiricism that you're espousing. 
My dislike of detectives comes from personal experience. My rights were violated twice. On two occasions I asked to speak with an attorney and they flat out said 'No' and continued with the questions.   Never, ever talk to a cop.
Interesting to hear its on you to actually pull in the money, since that requires a far better person than a number cruncher. 5 weeks to go until graduation here, so I'm curious: Is a big part of your job networking and building relationships with these CEO's? I'm imagining i-bank senior partners see an opportunity and go to some CEO's house like Will Smith in Pursuit of Happiness and make things work from there.   I know some people interning for an i-bank who can barely manage a relationship with their friends let alone a CEO, so I'm wondering if they're going to be getting the coffee for eternity and if they should abandon hope of becoming partner.
ha ha ha...
I think it is the opposite. Few nutjob Christians support the 9/11 Truth Movement because Fox news frowns on that...as far as the Tax issues well Fox has allways been Pro tax cuts(albiet for the rich usually) so that is why so many nutjob Christians are in the "Tax-Honesty" movement...whatever that is...I guess my point is Nutjob christians watch too much Fox news. PS this belongs in athiesim subreddit IMO
Because it's cheap as hell to show and gets viewers.
i like how they corrected "prices" to "prizes" but nothing else lol
So we all look alike to you do we?
I guess the upside is that you can getting wasted for less money.
What was the reaction to that? I read the book which was really good, and I saw the movie which they somehow managed to change from an awesome, compelling book into another one of those Disney kid movies. Harmless, and kids probably enjoyed it, but nowhere near as good. I still don't see how they could've attempted to censor that.
Number of installations doesn't mean they are competitors. Smart cars and Maseratis are not in competition, and Smart isn't Maseratis largest competitor because they have more wheels on the road. The competitors of ORACLE are DB2, MSSQL etc. I don't know if you will take my word for it if I say I do this for a living, but I can guarantee you that you would be laughed out of the room if you suggested MySQL to a customer where each and every transaction is sacred. It might fly where one can afford to lose transactions here and there (think search engines etc). _I_ would get you thrown out of a meeting if you said that MySQL was Oracle's largest competitor until the proposed acquisition of SUN.
well the nugs dont feel wet they seem normal but the smell is kinda sourish to explain it and theres little droplets on the bag after I get it, maybe he just has sweaty hands.
I've also got a not before 8pm rule, and only then if I don't have anything important to get done.
He could almost look manly if...... maybe not.
That sounds good. I have not had Chinese in a while.  What is your favorite?  I love sesame chicken and white rice with soy sauce and black pepper.
If you personally are worried about this particular situation, then yeah.  Seriously, there's nothing you're going to do about it besides posting online, so why waste the energy worrying?   Besides, this thing is less dangerous than the real flu. 
I think its more likely that Nancy Pelosi's personal agenda and power struggles with Obama will bring the Democratic party down.  I wish she would get out of the way so that Obama could focus on the business of repairing our nation.
And not just intellectuals; military strategists or world leaders may be just as smart as well known philosophers, they just use their minds differently  I, for one, am going to cast my vote for Archimedes, who was a mathematician (calculated the rough value of pi), physics (foundation of statics, explained the value of the lever), engineer (devised the screw pump to maintain a ship he had built) and inventor (the Archimedes heat ray, which focused mirrors to burn Roman ships attacking Syracuse)
If reddit would sell one of those window-stickies that was transparent save for an orange envelope, that'd be poifect.  I may create one in the interim.
Read about [Kisagotami's dead child](http://path.homestead.com/kisagotami.html)([another translation](http://www.katinkahesselink.net/tibet/mustard-seed.html)) The Buddha fails to do the miracle requested. The dead child stays dead. The Buddha is a failure.  Read the [Cula-Malunkyovada Sutta](http://www.accesstoinsight.org/tipitaka/mn/mn.063.than.html)  in which the Buddha refuses to discuss the big questions of cosmography. Notice the tedious pedantry of the early text. Later versions simplify it into nonsense in which the Buddha denies the law of the excluded middle, but in the original He denies the practical usefulness of holding the opinion that the universe is infinite and symmetrically denies the practical usefulness of holding the opinion that the universe is finite, without ever denying that one or other is true. The Buddha is an ignorant nit-picker.  Be disappointed by the lack of ambition in the [Sallatha Sutta](http://www.accesstoinsight.org/tipitaka/sn/sn36/sn36.006.nypo.html). Later versions have Buddhism as a cure for all suffering, but originally it was about not doubling your suffering through your cognitive behaviour. The [Nakulapita Sutta](http://www.accesstoinsight.org/tipitaka/sn/sn22/sn22.001.than.html ) continues the theme of training your mind so that you do not add mental anguish to old age and infirmity. The Buddha is merely a CBT trainer.  I think that the main reason people don't critize it much on reddit is that buried under 2500 years of historical accretions there was this bloke and his chums and they kept it real for three or four hundred years.
Not one I had to wrote, but maintain... but someone once wrote a reporting "engine" in VBA for Microsoft Access, instead of using the actual Microsoft Access reports to produce, you know, reports.  I stopped working there recently.
Aww did they forgot to put the DVD in the Satire section of your video store? No wonder you were confused.
You need to lighten up a bit, try shaking a baby that may help.
anyone retard who calls that red is A RETARD.
I think this has to do with communication between the person on the x-ray and the person doing the searching. I had my bag searched one time; the searcher pulled out a new item, verified with the x-ray tech., and sent the bag back through when the tech. was unsure that it was the item in question 3 or 4 times before finding the right item.  So in most instances I think it would be easy to get something through like this (i.e. having an easily accessible, allowable item with a similarly shaped, hidden prohibited item.)  On the plus side to that incident, they found a few army coins and my combat action badge that I had lost months earlier.
Linux is a platitude-spouting child?
Wow, this sounds great.  I'm going to try out the DivaCup version right away since that seems to be what most people are recommending.  Now please make one that gets rid of the OH MY FUCKING GOD I HAVE BECOME THE WHITE WHALE bloating and cramps.  Seriously, I feel like I should just ooze/roll about when it hits, and my stomach hurts from just the slightest touch of anything.  Pill makes me depressed and I gain weight, so I can't just cheat my way out of periods altogether.  :(
Thank you, Reddit. Thank you for existing.
Maybe you are a bit boring? Perhaps you act up too much and are really a bitch to discuss anything with
Leonardo da Vinci. He had no formal education, scrounged as an artist-for-hire, and was responsible for the most brilliant art ever created. He understood things like: * As things get further away, they get bluer.  * The exact measurements a piece of cloth has to be to act as a parachute.  * Arteriosclerosis -- he figured out what causes heart attacks.  * The exact qualities of facial expression, as evidenced by the Mona Lisa, which is an entirely expressionless face. He was the first person to intimately study human atatomy and flight (in terms of how birds fly). No end to the genius of this man. The runner up is Benjamin Franklin. Don't even get me started on Ben... but he was no da Vinci.
I actually thought it would be more like superman's home planet krypton, with people dressed in white and crystals everywhere, so unfortunately for me I ended up staying christian a bit longer than I otherwise would have. For the most part, what I remember from church was that if I stared at the ceiling fans long enough they would appear to reverse direction and that was awesome. I became an atheist by replacing God with leprechaun, and rejected God in favor of leprechauns.
I think I must be the only person who prefers vim over emacs, but prefers emacs keybindings.  
The murder of Mr Shepard is a despicable crime and it's just the killers got life.  However, using this poor man's death for a political agenda is quite repulsive too. It's telling that when the bill passed, the presiding Representative was - openly gay.  It remains to be seen why certain minorities have been singled out and whether this highly combustive concept of "hate crime" will lead to a witchhunt.
I thought the same thing about the Ellen sitcom. It was funny until she came out of the closet. Then, every episode had a message. Then it gets cancelled and everybody thinks it's because people weren't ready for gay television. I think people just weren't ready for unfunny tv.  I feel like I'm dating myself while putting myself in a very special class of tv viewers. I'll take a seat over there.
judging by the name and comments, you are German
Sure there is. Just use racist projections. 
Will surely suck.
I remember when I was in high school and I saw a fight during my PE class. The coaches stood back for a while and let the kids fight it out and then broke it up before things got out of hand.   I think both the kids ended up getting sent to the extension center for a little bit. This was only in 2004 in Texas high school.
Yeah, the rest was unnecessary, and not very funny.
Hadouken!  Shoryuken! /15 years SFII training
Where I am, I'm used to sauntering across roads and expecting drivers to slow down. When I went to Romania I learned that drivers don't slow for shit! 
Well, if God can have a son, sent to Earth... };-)
Oh come on, what's so bad about this guy? Yes he's biased, but not necessarily for religious reasons, and he makes some intelligent points even if I disagree with them.  If you want to pick on someone for religious reasons, [try this fool](http://www.reddit.com/user/PitOfDoom).
In pretty much every culture, 1.4 is the ideal value.
It's why I dislike the internets.
peering
The religion of the future will be a cosmic religion. It should transcend personal God and avoid dogma and theology. Covering both the natural and the spiritual, it should be based on a religious sense arising from the experience of all things natural and spiritual as a meaningful unity. Buddhism answers this description. If there is any religion that could cope with modern scientific needs it would be Buddhism.  ~Albert Einstein 
I don't own a person on which to carry said gigabytes.
Science is a meticulous and systematic means of revealing the world around us. It requires that we meticulously explore every crevice, nook, and cranny, and to find a plausible, sometimes daring or creative means of explaining natural phenomena. Yet, for every claim one makes sufficient evidence must be found to back up that claim. Spinning a man around a metal detector for a TV show isn't much of science, or a good sceptical debunking session for that matter. James Randi making a psychic look like a fool on a television show may be entertaining, just as it is entertaining to see a man light a newspaper on fire, but it is far from the depth that would be needed.  Anyway, I went off track there. What I am trying to say is that science is not very spiritual, particularily when it takes a very materialistic and naturalistic viewpoint. If we want to explore love and compassion perhaps we should talk about philosophy and its sub-branch named ethics (and further below that secular ethics) rather than a means of discovering natural phenomena through both emperical and rational methods. This question you pose seems to be a non-sequitor since it has nothing to do with emperical verification of a fact. I am curious to why I give time to it. While you are clearly enjoying, or at least using, the fruits of our secular humanist world. While the effects of the many giants of science are self-evident (Jenner, Newton, Pasteur), and some of the philosophies of the giants of religion are equally self-evident (Jesus and Buddha), I can't see the benefits that either of these men have given to society.
Looks like Nintendo needs to endorse decriminalization, may solve their problems.
BRAAAAAAIIIIINNNNNNNNSSSS!
&gt;Only subreddit mods can see/use the traffic tab &gt;I there a way for a mortal redditor to obtain such data does not compute, asshole
Once I had to hack together a GUI in Visual Basic to track an IP address in real-time. Not my ideal choice of tools, but lives were on the line!
Please stay in England. You wont be missed. You guys are almost as cheap as Canadians. Almost.
Thanks for asking me politely =)  As far as anyone knows, this is the one life you get.  Anyone that says they KNOW an afterlife exists is lying or god himself.  I think we can agree on that much...  Things that are scarce have value, and since my time here on earth is undetermined and very limited that makes me value the time I spend here very much.  As an aside-although an eternal life seems tempting to a mortal, at a deeper level I would find it boring and unfulfilling.  I don't mean to debate you on the existence of an afterlife here, but note that if an infinite afterlife is meaningless to me, than a limited one is definitely meaningful.  That doesn't mean that I want to lose all the time I do have here, but the idea that someday my life will end gives the time that I do spend a value to me.  I can't tell anyone else how to value their life-it would be like me trying to get you to value hockey or gay sex or animal crackers.  All that matters is that it matters to me (life and animal crackers, that is ;) )  I love to love, help others (I work in the health care field), I have great family and friends and enjoy all the things out of life that you enjoy on a day to day.  I love to debate and have meaningful conversations and I'm avidly looking for truth and the objective nature of the world we live in, wherever the evidence leads me.  I find it fascinating that everything is the way it is-and we have a pretty good idea how what we see has happened up until the big bang.  As another aside, if god were responsible for creating the sun it would almost take the joy and pleasure out of a sunset.  Sure it's beautiful, but he's god-why isn't it better?  I find life and reality infinitely more beautiful and meaningful than magic or supernatural beings.  Most atheists don't have any higher reported satisfaction out of life than theists.  So it's not like being an atheist will make you happier but I'm trying to convey it's nearly the same.  We are all humans, first and foremost.
yea kind of, I don't usually keep it in anything cept the bag i get it in, if it even lasts a week.
Ninjas obv
This man speaks the truth.  I hate the masses of downvoting nerds on this site.
Newton, or possibly even Bach. Read about him. He was astoundingly brilliant.
You should become a used car salesman.  False context metaphors are extensively covered in the training manual.
I am Batman.
You're not even reading this are you?   Sometimes Reddit feels like typing into a deep vortex of the collective unconscious. Sometimes it pays off and you get some stimulating discussion. Sometimes people surprise you with amazing facts, perspectives, open-mindedness and insight you've never imagined possible on such a hodge-podge online community.  This wasn't one of those times.
True... but it's not like Asimo is planning to use this technology to assissinate people for the good of a nation. That's the really crazy part of the plot. 
Fucking finally. Maybe now I'll get use something that alleviates some symptoms of my Crohn's disease without becoming a criminal. Thanks a lot DEA for telling *me* that usage of cannabis has no medical uses. Using cannabis can help me avoid nausea and at the same time give me an appetite so I don't have to go the emergency room extremely dehydrated while vomiting undiluted bile because the Crohn's is killing my appetite. I've gone to an emergency room for this five times.
I'll call the Democrats "socialist" when they nationalize an industry or two. They should start with the health insurance industry and follow with the railroads and the common communication carriers. That would be socialist and a good start on fixing the nation's seriously screwed up infrastructure.
Well, it's empty now.
There's an entire field devoted to Google Image Search?
